Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
Number of Reviews
40

Author
M. Pierce
  Has Hollywood run out of interesting characters and plot-driven suspense
thrillers that we must spend two hours watching Will Smith and a gritty Gene
Hackman exchange obtuse dialogue and run around dodging fireballs?  In Enemy of
the State, that is exactly right.
  A few parts The Net, and a few parts Conspiracy Theory, Enemy is about as
exciting as watching Smith talk to CGI aliens in 1997's lame brained Men in
Black.
Will this guy ever get a real role?  He has the Bruce Willis syndrome.
  The plot is bascially Smith, playing a lawyer, getting into hot water with
some high government murderers, who assassinated a powerful political figure
earlier in the movie, when a tape of the killing gets into his hands.  He
inlists the help of an old conspirator (Hackman), and, at the end, er...you
know.
  Enemy was one of the worst films of last year.  Not only was it sloppy in
telling its story and getting its facts straight, the acting was mediocre when
it should have been energy driven, and I didn't like how Smith always magically
out-smarted the badies when all the other extra characters, seeming more
intelligent than Smith, somehow got run over by a truck.
  Enemy came out around the same time as the superior Star Trek: Insurrection. 
I know these two films are different in, well, everything, but the fact that
Enemy outgrossed Insurrection just baffels me.  Somehow, quality can't
overshadow quantity.

Author
Greg King
ENEMY OF THE STATE (M).  
(Touchstone/Beuna Vista International)
Director: Tony Scott
Stars: Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Jon Voight, Regina King, Loren Dean, 
Jake Busey, Barry Pepper, Ian 
Hart, Scott Caan, Lisa Bonet, Jason Lee, James Le Gros, Jack Black, Jamie 
Kennedy, Bodhi Pine Elfman, 
Tom Sizemore (uncredited), Jason Robards (uncredited), Gabriel Byrne, 
Stuart Wilson, Laura Cayouette, 
Dan Butler
Running time: 136 minutes.
In the wake of the Watergate scandal of the '70's, Hollywood
produced a number of first rate paranoid conspiracy thrillers.  Films
such as The Parallax View (1974), The Conversation (1974), and Three
Days Of The Condor (1975), etc, called into question the government's
integrity and accountability, and astutely tapped into the mounting
sense of public disillusionment with officialdom.  Enemy Of The State
combines the best elements of these into the formula of a gripping and
exciting high tech chase thriller.
The film also raises some disturbing questions about the use
and blatant abuse of power by government agencies and the covert
erosion of democracy.  Writer David Marconi (who recently collaborated
on the Mission: Impossible sequel) provides plenty of insight into the
devious, high tech world of espionage.  This polished, taut and
unsettling thriller from gun producer Jerry Bruckheimer (The Rock,
Armageddon, etc) and director Tony Scott (Top Gun, Crimson Tide, etc)
is a welcome addition to the genre.  With Scott at the helm though,
the emphasis is definitely on heart stopping action, and there is
plenty of that.
The film kicks into gear when ambitious NSA administrator
Thomas Reynolds (Jon Voight) murders a congressman (an unbilled Jason
Robards) who opposes legislation that will increase the powers of the
omnipresent agency to spy on private citizens.  Unfortunately, the
murder is captured on film by an environmentalist (Jason Lee), who
becomes a target of Reynold's private hit squad.
However, the incriminating film finds its way into the hands
of lawyer Robert Dean (Will Smith), who is involved in a nasty case
involving heavy weight union thugs.  Dean suddenly finds himself
pursued by the NSA.  His life and reputation destroyed as they set out
to discredit him before he can expose the truth.  His only hope for
survival is the enigmatic Brill (Gene Hackman), an embittered ex- spy,
a dinosaur who has largely managed to remain underground for twenty
years.  Enemy Of The State is the antithesis of the typical buddy
formula, and the volatile relationship between Dean and Brill adds to
the dangerous situation.
Smith delivers a strong performance as the innocent citizen on
the run from government agencies and unsure of whom he can trust.  His
physically demanding role here is a change of pace from the confident,
wise-cracking persona he has projected in recent films.  Hackman
delivers his usual solid performance, although Brill bears some
resemblance to his eavesdropping private eye from The Conversation,
although twenty years on, and much more aggressive and willing to take
the fight up to his enemies.
Voight relishes this opportunity to play another villain, and
is convincingly suave, yet sleazy and sinister at the same time.  His
private hit squad is played by a cast of hot shot rising young stars,
including Barry Pepper (from Saving Private Ryan), Jake Busey, Scott
Caan, and Loren Dean (recently seen in Gattaca).  Gabriel Byrne
contributes a brief cameo, while Tom Sizemore appears uncredited as
Pintero, a union thug who plays a crucial role in events.
Scott really knows how to make solid and exciting commercial
thrillers, and he is in fine form here.  His direction is slick and
energetic, and he demonstrates an assured command of the cutting edge
technology available to the intelligence community.  The numerous
exciting chase sequences and narrow escapes are superbly staged, and
will have the adrenaline pumping.  Scott maintains a punishing pace
throughout that will have audiences on the edge of their seats.  He
has shot much of the action on the streets of Baltimore, bringing a
sense of urgency and realism to the material.

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Tony Scott joins up with producer Jerry Bruckheimer for the fifth time,
after 1986's TOP GUN (7/10), 1987's BEVERLY HILLS COP II (6.5/10),
1990's DAYS OF THUNDER (6.5/10) & 1995's CRIMSON TIDE (7.5/10), and
takes on the new age of technological surveillance, with a solid cast
led by the ultimate big-ticket opener Will Smith and Gene Hackman.
PLOT:
Lawyer Robert Dean gets caught up in an elaborate chase, after someone
drops an extremely important piece of evidence on his person. The NSA
(National Security Agency) decides to take matters into their own
hands, and destroy Dean's credibility whilst bugging every part of his
life. They track him all across town, in an attempt to recapture the
proof, while former-NSA employee Brill, helps him along the way. 
CRITIQUE:
The ultimate chase movie, this film offers us non-stop action, a decent
plot with a light touch, good acting, but does seem to run about half
an hour too long, and float into some repetitive waters once too often.
This movie starts off with a great premise and snowballing build-up,
and eventually gears into a kynetic two-hour chase via technologies
beyond anyone's imagination. Overall, I did like this movie, but did
find myself a little bored about halfway through the chasing, because
it all seemed like the same thing after a while. Having said that, the
film does offer a decent twist in its ending, and peps up its
jargon-filled dialogue with spurts of humour and cameos by James
Robards, Tom Sizemore (ballooning as we speak), David Byrne (who is
credited in the opening credits for some reason, but is really in the
film for only a few minutes) and the return of ex-Cosby kid Lisa Bonet
as the second tomato to Smith's wife in the movie.
On the acting side of things, Jon Voight is convincing as the head of a
department that's seriously lobbying to play "big brother" in America's
technological future. The rest of the bad guys are your standard fare,
with many of them sporting the same spiked, platinum haircuts, so that
nobody will detect them as a team (Good move, guys!). Gene Hackman
returns as a super-paranoid recluse fresh from the conclusion of his
role in 1974's THE CONVERSATION (6.5/10), in which he started of as a
surveillance expert, and eventually disintegrated into a total paranoid
fruitcake (Just a cool coincidence? I think not.) He is also quite good
in his role, and physically standardized as the "crazy, whacked-up guy"
as per his donning of the proverbial black rimmed glasses. Will Smith
was actually okay in his part, but seemed to have delivered most of his
funniest lines in the film's trailer. And lastly, Jason Lee of MALLRATS
(6/10) fame, pulls off another slick performance as the hip, young cat
who could swear with the best of them.
Director Scott also returns with many of his trademarks, as his
frenetic camera shots, five second edits, and overdone technical
mumbojumbo (How many times do we have to see the satellite dish
floating out in space, and the overhead camera shots of people being
chased...okay, Tony, we get it...they're cool shots, but let's move on
already!). He also made sure to have at least one wicked downpour near
the film's conclusion, as to solidify its presence in every one of his
films. All in all, the film is packed with energy and thrills, delivers
many decent performances, an intelligible plot with some obvious holes,
but does run on for about half and hour too long, and could get
repetitive at some points.  
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Will Smith turned down a scolarship to MIT to pursue his singing
career. He is also known as the "Fresh Prince"- rap singer. Will also
helmed a successful 6-year sitcom on NBC called "The Fresh Prince of
Bel-Air." Despite being a millionaire by age eighteen, Smith was
nonetheless deeply indebted to the I.R.S. when he landed said sitcom.
He had spent a lot of money on a house, cars and jewelry. He stands
6"3.
Gene Hackman was over 30 years old when he finally decided to take his
chance at acting by enrolling at the Pasadena Playhouse in California.
Legend has it that Hackman and Dustin Hoffman were voted "least likely
to succeed". His complete name is Eugene Alden Hackman.
Three TRUE ROMANCE (9/10) references that I caught in this movie
included the derogatory word used to describe African Americans in both
films, being "eggplant". The Mexican standoff shootout that shows up in
both films, and the appearance of one Tom Sizemore, who played a much
skinnier cop in the former movie, while portraying a real slob of a mob
boss in this one.
Gabriel Byrne started acting at the age of 29 and he went to America
for the first time when he was 37. He is originally from Ireland. He
was married to actress Ellen Barkin from 1988 to 1993.
Jason Lee is also a professional skateboarder.

Author
David Wilcock
Will Smith stars in this amiable action movie directed by Top Guns Tony
Scott. Smith is Robert Clayton Dean, who manages to get possession of a tape
showing the murder of a congressman. The murderer (Jon Voight) wants this
tape back, and Will's life is put on the line as he tries to work out why
the hell everyone is trying to kill him. Helping him is 'Brill' an ex-agent
played by Gene Hackman.
Enemy of the State provides enough thrills to keep the popcorn punters
happy, although it might disappoint all the members of the audience who
prefer to have their stories with a little bit more meat. While the
direction is certainly flash, and the chases good fun, some the plot twists
are silly, and the technology used seems a little to advanced for it's own
good (even entering Blade Runner territory.) Still, director Tony Scott
keeps the thrills coming, and the film is directed and paced like some hyper
music video (much like Top Gun) Will Smith is more than adept at playing the
action hero, delivering his lines with a cocky ease. Hackman does a great
character role, even if it does amount to shouting a lot. Jon Voight is a
suitably cool bad guy, and Lisa Bonet is fine as Smiths wife.
The story, by David Marconi, is a little predictable, but it's a good
premise to hang a action movie on. It might take a lot of liberties from The
Conversation, including one scene which is a big homage, but this doesn't
really attract any of the excitement away from the film. It certainly won't
win any awards for originality, though. While no smart statements are
delivered, the script is certainly above average in action movie terms.
While Enemy of the State is, for the most part, good, it sadly suffers from
being 30 minutes too long. The film looks like it's going to end on a
perfect conclusion, but then it just keeps on going. This movie could easily
have been wrapped up much quicker, but it's a bit too involved in it's own
story, and it soon has to wrap up a lot of lose ends, which is a shame.
Still, the pumping music, fast cuts and fun acting detract slightly from
this.
In the end, Enemy of the State is a 'higher class' of action movie, and
while it could have been shorter, it's an entertaining and sometimes clever
look at the world of espionage, and is worth a look.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
"You know, for kids"- Norville Barnes

Author
Joe Chamberlain
Starring Will Smith; Gene Hackman; Jon Voight & Lisa Bonet
If nothing else, Enemy Of The State will do one thing. It leaves no doubt
that Will Smith is officially a movie star. While Smith has been in other
hits like Independence Day and Men In Black, their success could be
attributed as much to their high-end special effects and not so much to
Smith's presence. Well, no more. While Enemy Of The State has great action
sequences and special effects, the main attraction here is Will Smith. He
does a great job in this film, and when you throw Gene Hackman and Jon
Voight into the mix, you can almost guarantee that you have a very
entertaining movie. Smith plays an attorney who becomes mixed up in
something that he wants no part of. A secret US Government agency thinks
that Smith's character has acquired some very sensitive information that
they don't want him to have. They are afraid that he may leak this
information to the press and ruin them. So the agency, led by a very nasty
Jon Voight, sets out do discredit him as a preemptive strike, in case he can
use this information before they can get it back from him. Along the way
Smith enlists the help of a former Government surveillance expert (Gene
Hackman) in order to get his life back.
Enemy Of the State is a top notch movie in every sense of the word. The
acting is terrific, the writing is intelligent, and visually it looks great.
Smith does a great job carrying the film, and he very easily proves that he
is capable of more than just comic relief in a movie. No surprises when it
comes to the performances of Gene Hackman and Jon Voight. These two men
leave little doubt why they are two of the most talented actors working
today. In a little bit of irony, Hackman's paranoid surveillance expert
could almost be the same character that he played back in the early
seventies in The Conversation. The irony being that The Conversation in one
of the worst films of all time and Enemy Of The State is one of the better
movies of the year.
The other thing that is worth mentioning is the fact that unlike many other
similar cloak and dagger type movies, Enemy Of The State doesn't suffer from
the inevitable confusing plot twists that usually plague this type of movie.
At no point will you find yourself scratching your head wondering what the
heck is going on. This is not to say that Enemy Of The State is without it's
intricate plot twists, quite the contrary. The writing is simply so slick
that a brain-damaged chimpanzee could follow along. Another interesting part
of this movie is the technology that the government uses to track and spy on
Will Smith's character. You can't help getting just a little uneasy when you
wonder just who much of this stuff is real, and how much of it is just
strictly a work of fiction. My money is on very little fiction.
Enemy Of The State should appeal to action fans and fans of the suspense
genre alike. Will Smith fans will not be disappointed either. While he isn't
cracking jokes in this movie, his charisma makes up for it. Enemy Of The
State is a very entertaining way to spend a couple of hours.

Author
Scott Renshaw
ENEMY OF THE STATE
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Jon Voight, Regina King, Loren Dean,
Jake Busey, Barry Pepper, Tom Sizemore, Lisa Bonet, Gabriel Byrne.
Screenplay:  David Marconi.
Producer:  Jerry Bruckheimer.
Director:  Tony Scott.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  127 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Director Tony Scott presents what sometimes seems like a documentary
on electronic surveillance in ENEMY OF THE STATE.  His vehicle is the
story of Robert Clayton Dean (Will Smith), a Washington D.C. attorney who
unwittingly becomes embroiled in a conspiracy when a computer disk finds
its way into his shopping bags.  On the disk is evidence that a National
Security Agency boss named Reynolds (Jon Voight) engineered the murder of
a U.S. congressman (an uncredited Jason Robards) who would have killed
legislation making it easier for the NSA to spy on citizens.  Piece by
piece Dean's identity is destroyed and accusations are trumped up against
him, until the only chance he has left is a secretive former government
operative known only as Brill (Gene Hackman).
     It's a great button-pushing premise for a millenial-angst-heavy
information age, full of shadowy government operations and technological
voyeurism of every shape and form.  Early on, however, Scott starts to
fetishize all that technology.  Satellites sweep across the sky from
hundreds of miles above to pinpoint a fleeing target; microtransmitters
are planted in shoes, pens and cell phones; phone and bank records betray
every personal secret.  The first time a chase scene spills over with
surveillance details, it's effective and alarming.  The second time, you
start to notice that it drags scenes out much longer than they need to be.
The third, fourth and fifth times, you wonder why the omniscient gadgetry
is beginning to seem more cool than scary.  Is this a movie about people
oppressed by electronics, or a commercial for electronics?
     Fortunately, the human angle is in the capable hands of Will Smith.
In his first purely starring role -- no buddy cop, no aliens -- Smith
continues to show the charisma of a star.  He's a more effective hounded
Everyman than you might expect, cracking wise when it serves the moment 
while generally handling his predicament with intelligence and resolve.
Hackman arrives fairly late in the film to provide some requisite bonding
moments, but mostly the weight of ENEMY OF THE STATE falls squarely on
Smith's shoulders.  He proves more than capable of handling it.
     He also gets to work with an action/thriller script considerably more
coherent than average.  Dean's imperfect relationship with his wife
(Regina King) links deftly into the conspiracy plot, as does the
connection between Brill and go-between Rachel (Lisa Bonet).  The
resolution is a rushed disappointment -- mixing in a dopey mob sub-plot
just when the table-turning pleasures of Dean and Brill watching the
watchmen had been so promising -- but for nearly two hours it's pretty a
effective story.  With Scott keeping the pacing steady and intense, all
the script needs to do is avoid situations so obviously stupid that you
feel insulted.  Marconi's script may not be impressive, but it's
unobtrusive, which is one of the higher compliments you can pay an
action/thriller script in 1998.
     Still, there's the matter of all those gee-whiz shots of satellite
cams, computer extrapolations and general manipulation of technology.
Tony Scott has always been a director who never met a five-second piece of
film he liked, and in ENEMY OF THE STATE it often proves distracting as he
whips back and forth between Smith talking to someone and someone
_listening_ to Smith talking to someone, a couple dozen times in the space
of a minute.  Sure it's unsettling to consider that the only privacy you
may have is inside your head, but it's most unsettling if we connect with
a character connecting with that reality the hard way.  Will Smith
provides that humanity almost in spite of Scott's inventory of spy gear.
The director takes the edge off the edgy concept, turning in a solid
thriller that hypes us up when it should be freaking us out.

Author
Matt Williams
You're not paranoid if they're really after you.  That's the message of
Enemy of the State, the latest techno-thriller from director Tony Scott
who takes an exciting, if exaggerated, look at the lack of privacy in
our increasingly technological society.
Will Smith portrays Robert Clayton Dean, a DC lawyer who unexpectedly
becomes the target of intense scrutiny, when a former acquaintance
(Jason Lee) gives him possession of a tape desperately wanted by the
National Security Agency.
You see, the tape implicates NSA bureaucrat Reynolds (Jon Voight) in a
highly unethical and illegal activity.  So, he is bringing the full
technological power of "big brother government" to track down and
recover the tape, no matter whose civil liberties get violated.
So, when Robert finds himself under constant surveillance, the target of
a smear campaign in the press, in unexpected financial distress, and in
danger of losing his very life, there's only one person he can trust.
Brill (Gene Hackman) is a security expert hired, but never seen, by
Robert in the past.  But the secretive Brill may not want to get
involved.
Enemy of the State is stuffed to the gills with an ample supply of
technology and paranoia.  Sure, it exaggerates here and there, but it
shrewdly grounds all of its hyperbole in technological fact and jargon.
We're introduced to a hidden world...a surveillance state which exists
around us even now, but the average citizen is oblivious to the
countless electronic eyes upon him.
The bad guys in the film aren't completely evil (well...okay, Jon Voight
is evil...but the rest are simple bureaucrats and technogeeks just doing
their job).  In fact, some of the most sympathetic characters in the
film are a few of those technogeeks.  However, the message of the film
is that the sum of all these earnest governmental workers "just doing
their job" add up to a powerful weapon in the hands of an ambitious
bureaucrat (like Voight).
Will Smith once again proves an amiable lead.  Taken by itself, the role
of Robert Clayton Dean is a little bland.  But Smith's charisma shines
through, and makes Dean a character worth rooting for.
Gene Hackman is, as usual, a welcome presence.  The surveillance
atmosphere of Enemy of the State favorably compares to The Conversation
(also featuring Hackman), though the latter is easily a better film.
Hackman's shrewd paranoia enlivens the film just when it begins to drag
in its second half.  So what if his character makes a few
out-of-character mistakes...it's a pleasure just to watch Hackman chew
on this meaty role.
The plot of the film is, unfortunately, coincidence-driven.  If a
certain sequence of events didn't happen in just the right order and
just the right time, there'd be no movie.  Luckily the action sequences
have enough energy that you can ignore the manufactured plot and still
have a good time.  But a truly sharp thriller should be able to combine
both plot and action.
Enemy of the State is a fun film to watch, even though it doesn't have
as much substance as it initially seems.  Still, you might think twice
the next time you spy a surveillance camera glaring your way.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Author
Michael Dequina
Anyone who thinks that the key to Will Smith's big-screen success lies
solely on his attitude and charisma will be proven wrong once and for all
by his work in Tony Scott's smart, stylish thriller.  Aside from a handful
of wry wisecracks delivered in the early going, Smith's Robert Clayton Dean
is a straight arrow, a labor attorney who is hunted down by some shady
government types after coming into possession of a videotape of a
congressman's (Jason Robards) murder.  Dean has trouble evading his
pursuers--and their high-tech surveillance equipment--until an equally
shady former NSA agent (Gene Hackman) arrives on the scene to offer some
reluctant help.
As amusing as Hackman and his riff on his character in _The_Conversation_
is, it is with his first appearance (which doesn't come until about an hour
in, if not more) that _Enemy_of_the_State_'s tightly coiled tension begins
to unravel somewhat; there is much more suspense when Dean, a common man
with no combat skills or the like, is called on to evade government
professionals solely on his wits.  But on the whole, David Marconi's script
is solid, intelligently bringing up realistic issues regarding privacy
while serving the slam-bang thrills required of any Jerry Bruckheimer
production.  Pulling the entire enterprise together is Scott, who uses his
large bag of dazzling visual tricks in good service to the plot; and Smith.
 He paints a vivid portrait of paranoia and fear, and his natural presence
and rapport with the audience is invaluable in creating a likable character.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@iname.com   |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com

Author
Bob Bloom
Enemy of the State, starring Will Smith, Gene Hackman and Jon Voight
2 1/2 stars out of 4
 Depending on your level of paranoia, you will either scoff at Enemy of the
State or check your toothbrush, smoke alarm, cell phone and various items
of clothing to see if Big Brother is indeed monitoring every moment of your
life.
 Enemy of the State builds upon the concept that ours, because of video
camera, spy satellites and other technological marvels, is a world in which
privacy is a quickly becoming an illusion.
 As chief villain Jon Voight explains, soon the only privacy will be what's
in your head.
 As the film opens, a congressional committee is looking at a bill that
will allow the government to conduct unfettered surveillance of its
citizens. After all, supposedly lots of people out there - in and out of
the country - hate the United States and its way of life and want to
destroy it. Thus the justification for the bill's passage.
 To get what he wants, Voight, a top government official, resorts to
murder. Unbeknownst, at least at the outset, to Voight and his team of
techno-nerds, is that the crime was caught on tape.
 This discovery sets off a chain of events that eventually involves Robert
Dean (Will Smith), a labor lawyer whose life is turned upside down - and
for most of the proceedings he doesn't even know why.
 It seems he was slipped a copy of the incriminating footage copied onto a
computer disk, and Voight's operatives are trying to retrieve it wouth
tipping their hands.
 What makes Enemy of the State work, and it does up until the last reel, is
the little voice it sets off in the back of your mind. Sure, it's fiction,
a movie.
 But, does the government have the capabilities to watch our every move,
and if it does, are we being spied upon right now.
 The movie plays off the now common usage of video cameras everywhere - in
restaurants, department store changing rooms, sky cams, cameras that
monitor busy intersections.
 Do they all feed into a mainframe somewhere that the government can log
onto the check up on us? Possible, but highly, improbable. Or is it?
 Eventually Dean teams up with a former operative (Gene Hackman) and all is
made right with the world - or at least Dean's portio of it.
 Director Tony Scott keeps the paranoia level high, continually showing
scenes of a spy satellites being moved around merely to spy on one
individual, while his operatives plant bugs and transmitters on Dean's
clothes, shoes, phone and pen.
 But eventually Scott and and his four screenwriters run out of imagination
and resort to a ludicrious finale involving a stereotypical Mafia boss, who
acts like a grade Z Don Corleone.
 This nearly destroys all the nearly one hour and 45 minutes that lead up
to this point.
 Smith works very well as the confused, but determined lawyer who is in
over his head, and completely unaware of the machinations going on around
him.
 As in Independence Day and Men in Black, Smith works best when paired with
an older, more experienced actor. In ID4 it was Jeff Goldblum, Tommy Lee
Jones created chemistry in Men in Black, and in Enemy of the State, Smith
teams with Hackman, as a disheveled, semi-paranoid ex-operative who helps
Dean regain his life and in the process, gets one for himself.
 The real treat is watching the young supporting actors who play Voight's
team of computer nerds who treat the entire affair as if it the planet was
their own private video screen and we were all pawns they could move around
in a game of life and death.
 They're not evil, per se, just deadened. They have lost their humanity to
their computers and are either unconcerned or unaware of the havoc they
wreak.
 Enemy of the State is a colorful political thriller. You may find it
perposterous or you may think it hits too close to him - maybe too close.
Either way, after seeing it, you'll be more conscious of the technology
surrounding you.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com

Author
Brian Takeshita
The National Security Agency is the branch of the Department of Defense
charged with encrypting our nation's secrets and decrypting the secrets of
others.  They have electronic listening posts across the globe set up to
listen in on everything from simple radio waves to hyperencoded satellite
burst transmissions.  The NSA's acres of computers located underground at
Fort Meade, Maryland work twenty-four hours a day to intercept and process
information traveling through wires and through the air.  Simply put, those
who work for the NSA are the premiere eavesdroppers of the world, capable of
gathering electronic intelligence with staggering means.  But what if this
capability were directed internally, at our own citizens?  In fact, what if
it were used to pursue a personal agenda?  It is this question which is the
focus of Tony Scott's ENEMY OF THE STATE.
The film begins at a lake shore with a last-minute attempt by NSA Deputy
Reynolds (Jon Voight) to convince Congressman Hammersly (Jason Robards),
chairman of a key House committee, to pass a bill which would grant the NSA
carte blanche in placing any individual under electronic surveillance.
Receiving Hammersly's emphatic "no," Reynolds orders the Congressman
murdered before he can get back into his car.  However, the murder is
captured on tape by an unwitting nature photographer.  When the photographer
later realizes he is holding evidence with tremendous implications, he finds
himself hunted by NSA operatives, and in his attempt to flee, stuffs the
incriminating recording into the shopping bag of labor attorney Robert Dean
(Will Smith).  Reynolds and his men soon realize what has transpired and
embark on an operation to retrieve the tape, silencing Dean for good if
necessary.
Okay, so here's a guy who's going along his merry way, when he's suddenly
mixed up in something completely over his head, and he doesn't even know
why.  Sound familiar?  It's the plot for a ton of movies.  Come on, think a
bit and I'm sure you'll be able to come up with at least a few.  So if the
film doesn't exactly tow the line for originality, is it too much to expect
that other aspects should make up for it?  Of course not.  Does ENEMY OF THE
STATE deliver?  Sort of.
This movie is supposed to be one of those thrillers that uses technology as
a basis for much of its intrigue and action, but if you want to impress your
audience, you usually want to include some really neat stuff.  ENEMY OF THE
STATE has a lot of neat gizmos, but unfortunately, almost everything used in
the film is stuff that doesn't even meet our expectations.  A tracking
device planted in Dean's shoe?  Oh my, what will they think of next?
Please, Maxwell Smart had the first cellular phone loaded in his.  For
original, check out TOTAL RECALL where Schwarzenegger had the tracking
device shoved up his nose and didn't even know it.  Some Mr. Universe.
Is the ability of the bad guys to follow Dean's every move original?  No.  I
mean, even FAIR GAME with Cindy Crawford used the idea of having a whole
bunch of computers and gadgets to track someone, and here's Tony Scott,
flashing it in our faces as if he's the first guy who's thought of it.
However, even if it's nothing new, it still provides a vehicle for some
exhilarating action scenes, the kind that Scott is a pro at - the kind where
it's not just a bunch of people running around and shooting at each other,
but also constantly talking at the same time.  Having some guy at a computer
feeding information to a some other guy actually doing the running around
adds another dimension to the tired old chases we get with every other
action-thriller.  Think about nearly silent World War II movie dogfight
scenes, versus TOP GUN (which Scott directed) where the air combat included
Maverick and Goose feeding each other information.  Does it busy up the
scene?  Maybe.  Does it heighten the excitement and the tension?  Yes, it
does.  Am I asking too many questions in this review?  What do you think?  Huh?
There's a lot of yelling in this movie.  As much as it works to further the
excitement in an action sequence, it is a severe detriment to the rest of
the scenes.  It seems as though everyone in the film has to have at least a
few shouted lines, and it gets annoying pretty quickly.  Perhaps the worst
example is an argument that Dean and his wife (Regina King) have over their
marriage's stability, where both of them are not just yelling, they're
yelling too loudly for the audience to take.  I swear, it was louder than
some of the explosions that elsewhere punctuate the film.  They're angry and
frustrated.  Okay, we get the point.
Gene Hackman is great (as usual) as Brill, an ex-NSA surveillance specialist
who comes to Dean's aid.  Unfortunately, he shows up after half the film is
already over.  Will Smith, who is in the whole film, is simply miscast since
we expect him to be his usual wisecracking self, but we instead get a flat
performance.  He could yell and run all he wanted to, but I never got the
picture of a man in danger.  Working against Smith is the scripting of his
character, which doesn't do much to endear the audience toward him.  Dean is
a lawyer with an inflated ego and a set of lungs full of hot air.  I started
to dislike him in his first thirty seconds of screentime.  Jon Voight is
perfectly cast as the official with an agenda, but the script is flawed with
regard to his character as well.  We see that Reynolds is not just an evil
guy with a plan to grab as much power as he can, but has a wife and a
daughter, and lives a life not unlike that of the "hero" of the film.  Why
screenwriter David Marconi wanted to engender sympathy for the villain is
beyond me.
This film also gets points taken off for copious use of what I call the
"techno-caption".  I'm sure you've seen it before:  Instead of a location
title (i.e., Washington, D.C.) just appearing at the top or bottom of the
screen, the words appear as if being typed very quickly on some futuristic
word processor, accompanied by an electronic beep-like sound effect as each
letter emerges.  It all seems so superfluous.
In all, this film thinks tries to pass itself off as being cleverer than it
actually is.  The action segments are engaging, and the pace is at some
times frenetic, but it's in those other scenes where old concepts are being
trotted out as new and innovative that ENEMY OF THE STATE fails.  One neat
little thing to look for, however:  When the NSA pulls up an old file
picture of Brill, it's actually a photo of Hackman's character Harry Caul in
Francis Coppola's 1974 film THE CONVERSATION, in which Hackman played a guy
who made his living conducting surveillance on other people.  That, I must
say, was pretty cool.

Author
Matt Prigge
Director: Tony Scott
Writer: David Marconi
Starring: Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Jon Voight, Regina King, Loren Dean,
Barry Pepper, Jack Black, Seth Green, Jamie Kennedy, Ian Hart, Lisa
Bonet, Jake Busey, Scott Caan, Jason Lee, Stuart Wilson, Tom Sizemore,
Gabriel Byrne, James LeGros, Jason Robards, Phil Hawn, Dan Butler,
Philip Baker Hall
With the sudden liberal emergence of personal privacy abounding in the
news lately, what with that whole Clinton thing going on (you know, 100
million bucks to discover the president got boinked by an intern - oh,
please, government, waste my taxes just a bit more, would you?), it's
about time Tony Scott helmed the newest action pic disguised as an
important if not slightly ignorant social statement.  With this and
"Crimson Tide," he's created two successfully chilly films that are
interesting, exciting, even pretty smart, but never totally riveting as
cinema, and the problem I think with each of these films is that each
film is too obsessed with its message to ever be really satisfying, and
too obsessed with looking all cutting edge to ever be totally smart.
That film dealt with a civil war inside a nuclear submarine over whether
or not to follow rules or question them, and was appropriately scary and
all, but never totally thrilling or overly brilliant.
"Enemy of the State" is the same way: it's engrossing for its entire
running time, and it's scary the way that it shows a man's decent into
kafkaism, but it's too technical.  It's too cold and not as fascinating
or exciting as it could be.  It casts Will Smith, one of the better big
budget leading men in movies these days because he's charming and witty
and never uninteresting, and hopes that his charisma can make up for his
character not being well developed enough to really be a person.  I hate
to do this, but last year's film "The Game" got it damn perfect: it
casts Michael Douglas as a deeply flawed human being, a man who is cold
and has cut off everyone from his life, and then pulls everything he
thought he had as a security blanket away from him and watched what
happened.  The result was not only a film that was exciting and
chilling, but also the best mindfuck of the entire year.  Not that I
want every kafkaesque film to be "The Game" (this year's "The Spanish
Prisoner" succeeds with less thrills and chills), but it should be an
example of what works and what doesn't.
Will Smith's character is, frankly, too perfect, at least too movie
perfect.  He had an affair with another woman (Lisa Bonet, ha ha), but
his relationship with his wife (Regina King) is basically fine
regardless.  He has a kid, and he's raking in money as a lawyer, albeit
a very good and reasonably moral one.  So he generally doesn't have any
real problems as a human being, and is therefore boring...except that he
is played by Will Smith, who embodies him with about as much Will Smith
charm as he can without entering "ID4"/"Men in Black" territory.  He's a
good dramatic actor (just see the first half hour of "Six Degrees of
Separation" for proof of this, not that he isn't great the whole time),
and here, he makes his character likable and sympathetic without any
real strain on his character, which makes the film lack any real deep
interesting qualities.
Smith becomes involved in a mass conspiracy involving the assasination
of a Senator opposed to a government law that would create world
surveillance, extinguishing privacy as we know it from the world, under
the pretense that it would make crime easier to control, when he is
passed a disk of the event caught on tape by an outside party (a nature
observer played by, uh, Jason Lee).  The government wants the disk, and
is prepared to destroy his life to get it.  As Smith's plight is
dramatized, we are introduced to the masterminds who surveillance him,
sitting in vans disguised as other businesses, staring at computers and
pulling out tricks faster than a speeding bullet.  These guys (played by
Jack Black, Jamie Kennedy, and Seth Green) are the most interesting part
of this film because they're, well, fascinating: they're doing their
jobs, which are evil, but the film doesn't view them as such, and they
almost become our friends.  We like these guys for the sole reason that
the film doesn't automatically judge them as the villains.  They're also
scary because we get the idea that they're not fully aware of the impact
their jobs have on the world.  It's as if they're obsessed with their
jobs, not because they're evil, but because, hey, it's a fun job, and no
one else can do it like them.
Unfortunately, this also backfires a bit on the film: instead of being
the flashlight in the darkened room that "The Game" was, you see
everything, and are thus not as freaked out because you know what is
going on.  Sure, you're chilled, but you're not exacty freaked out by
what's going on.  But what do you expect from Tony Scott, the man who
never met a five-second piece of film he ever liked.  He's a not-bad
director because, hell, he is always interesting to watch (if not
occasionally moronic - exhibit A: "Days of Thunder"), but the reason
he's not great is because he's too technical and calculated.  His shots
are perfectly executed, and leave nothing to the imagination, and
they're always making sure you're paying attention.  This is incredibly
annoying, and it reduces "Enemy of the State" to a mechanical mishmash
of flashy images that never expand the mind at any great depths, but
still manage to entertain without any real problems.
Despite never actually becoming great, it's never actually boring and
it's always intriguing.  Watching the government set-up Smith is
endlessly fascinating, and since we care about Smith's likeable
protagonist, we are set-up for a good two hours worth of Tom
Clancy-esque entertainment.  Add the best big cast this side of the
annual Woody Allen film (everyone from Gabriel Byrne to Dan Butler pop
up for cameos), and you've got a good old fashioned escapist drama which
does all the thinking for you so that you never have to actually
question the debate over personal privacy and so you can follow Will
Smith's plight without a minute's worth of boredom.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Harvey S. Karten
   Not so long ago there was a great deal of concern about
security in the ATM's.  Depositors were getting mugged at an
alarming rate and citizens' groups were frightened. 
Legislation was enacted to answer their concerns.  Security
guards were posted and, to help deter criminals, surveillance
cameras were installed in all booths.  While the public were
not completely mollified, few voices of innocent citizens were
raised in protest.  Some cities began installing similar
surveillance cameras in subways, always scary places, while
other cameras were located on lampposts in city streets.  Not
even the American Civil Liberties Union was particularly
piqued.
   In 1998, just about the only use of electronic gadgetry that
disgusted large segments of the American people was the
operation of telephone tape recorders to chronicle one silly
woman's descriptions of President Clinton's peccadilloes.  Yet
these wires are about the simplest, most basic, most
unsophisticated devices known to spies.  Why are these
details mentioned in a review of "Enemy of the State"? 
Simply because the premise around which the movie is
framed is flawed.  The audience wants the hero to fight a
knave that all can agree is positively evil.  Since the
government officials who make life difficult for a nice
Washington lawyer want only congressional permission to
extend information-gathering technology in a country that is
increasingly threatened by terrorism, the folks staring at the
screen may just wonder what the commotion is about.  Oh,
sure, the higher-ups may engage in extra-legal tactics to get
their way--such as murdering a congressman who opposed
the escalation of spy gear--but aside from that, and from the
fact that they are eager for a promotion, are they really the
incarnate evil we love to hate?
   This blemish aside, "Enemy of the State" is a top-notch,
edge-of-the-seat thriller that puts actor Will Smith in his first
major, starring role, and he comes across terrifically as a 
likable guy because he's such a human hero. He's no macho
soldier of the Kurt Russell variety.  To the contrary.  He's
befuddled a good deal of the time, especially when he is
ordering lingerie in a store brimming with compliant models
you'd expect to see in a Victoria's Secret catalogue.  He's
understandably flustered when he finds himself on candid
camera more than any subject deserves to be, and chased
down unmercifully by government thugs working under the
orders of the spiffily-dressed apparatchik of the National
Security Agency who looks remarkably like former defense
secretary Robert McNamara.  What makes his situation all
the more pitiable is that he's carrying a computer diskette that
they want and that he does not even know he has.
   Since "Enemy of the State" is a collaboration between the
premier action-adventure producer, Jerry Bruckheimer, and
director Tony Scott, we can expect lots of fireworks, and we
get all we want, almost incessantly without a breather to
check our credulity meters.  Director Scott, noted for such
popular films as "Top Gun," manages to shoehorn a
secondary plot which meets up with the main story to provide
a clever, fiery finale to the proceedings.  Throughout, Scott
displays an impressive array of computer gadgetry that can
cough up a man's vital and other statistics in seconds when
government nerds feed it a picture of the hapless prey.
    Establishing that attorney Robert Dean (Will Smith)
dislikes organized crime's infiltration into a labor union, the
action picks up when a powerful congressman (Jason
Robards) who opposes legislation favored by National
Security Agency official Reynolds (Jon Voight), is murdered
while playing in the woods with his dog.  The crime is
accidentally photographed by a bird watcher, whose presence
was picked up by an NSA crew of nerds. His phone is
tapped, and he is chased by the officials who want to recover
his digital photos.  When Dean unwittingly receives the
evidence, he becomes the target of the assassins.  While
Dean must avoid being apprehended for reasons he is not
aware, he is in hot water as well for his relationship with a
former girl friend, Rachel Banks (Lisa Bonet), his wife
(Regina King) throwing him out without believing a word of
his story.  (Despite her membership in ACLU she is
convinced on little evidence that her main man is guilty of
adultery.)  
     Director Scott often puts his cameras into high gear with
some awe-inspiring jump shots--including a really long shot of
a satellite allegedly 154 miles in space without which little
surveillance would be possible.  He establishes Dean's
relationship with an eccentric electronics expert, Brill (Gene
Hackman), who was thrown out of Tehran after the Shah was
expelled and who has since bottled himself up in a totally
secure building with a stack of monitoring equipment.  
   Of the two big, rousing chase scenes, one is reminiscent of
"Ronin," though this time the victim races from the perps on
foot via the dividing line of the freeway.   The big shootout
that climaxes the action results from Dean's artfully contrived
setup, which convinces his new pal, Brill, that he is anything
but the stupid man that Brill thought him to be.
   Perhaps the audience would get better clues to the villainy
of Reynolds' scheme to bug the country if scripter David
Marconi threw in ways that the average Joe could be
adversely affected. As critic Roger Ebert says in his review,
an innocent bystander in the Ken Starr investigation had her
tax returns audited, her neighbors and employers questioned,
and her adoption of a war orphan threatened all because she
testified that Kathleen Willey had asked her to lie about a
meeting with President Clinton.  We must go back to the
Ancient Greeks for inspiration (as did the creators of "A Bug's
Life.")  The most important word in the vocabulary of the
Athenian philosophers was "moderation."  We must always
seek a balance between the desires of government for more
powers to control crime and the needs of the American
people for privacy.  "Enemy of the State" does not really give
us pause to think about lofty issues like that one, nor must be
require it to do so.  It's a popcorn thriller with a wonderful
performance by the warm-and-fuzzy Will Smith who proves
that you don't need big muscles, a large piece, or even
military training to be an uncommon hero.

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: November 20, 1998
Starring: Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Jon Voight, Regina King, Loren Dean,
Jake Busey, Barry Pepper,
Gabriel Byrne, Jason Lee
Directed by: Tony Scott
Distributed by: Buena Vista Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (language, violence) 
Lean, mean, escapist thrillers are a tough product to come by. Most are
unnecessarily complicated, and others have no sense of expediency -- the
thrill-ride effect gets lost in the cumbersome plot. Perhaps the
ultimate escapist thriller was THE FUGITIVE, which featured none of the
flash-bang effects of today's market but rather a bread-and-butter,
textbook example of what a clever script and good direction is all
about. The latest Tony Scott movie, ENEMY OF THE STATE, doesn't make it
to that level. It's a true nineties product that runs like greased
lightning through a maze of cell phones and laptop computers, without
looking back. 
Although Director Scott has made missteps in the past, such as the lame
thriller THE FAN, he's generated a good deal of energy in pictures like
CRIMSON TIDE and TOP GUN. That vibrant spirit is present here, shown in
well-timed and carefully planned chase scenes that give the movie an
aura of sheer speed. ENEMY OF THE STATE also features an unprecedented
use of amazing cinematography -- Director of Photography Daniel Mindel
throws a staggering amount of different views, angles, lenses, and film
stocks at the audience that goes a long way toward involving the
audience in the movie. ENEMY is truly a visual experience, and that's
only one of the reasons it's such a fun watch.
The movie lights up with an aging senator visited by NSA deputy chief
Thomas Reynolds (Jon Voight). Reynolds wants a new communications act
passed to allow the government free reign in the use of surveilance
equipment, but the senator plans to bury the bill in committee. Reynolds
has the senator offed, but not before the murder is caught on a
naturalist's camera. By an extremist chain of events, the tape ends up
in labor lawyer Robert Dean (Will Smith)'s posession, and it's not long
before he's running from Reynolds' cronies. It's only with the help of
an ex-spook named Brill (Gene Hackman) that Dean is able to get to the
bottom of things. 
The acting is top notch, and the three principles - Smith, Hackman, and
Voight - are generally more mature and excellent all around. Smith puts
aside the wisecracking act and becomes a normal human being; Voight
tones down the amount of sneer he puts into his character for greater
ominpotence; and Hackman is simply over the top in the mysterioso role.
Smith's regular joe comes off particularly well, as he runs from
authorties for reasons that he knows not. The supports are also in fine
form, lending credibility to the main roles and advancing the plot in
key areas. This is, for the holiday crowd, the hot ticket; as well as
anyone looking for a serving of genuine action in a market that is
otherwise lacking.

Author
Steve Kong
I thought Chris Carter (creator of The X-Files) and Oliver Stone were
paranoid. No, there's someone more paranoid than these two put together:
David Macroni, the screenwriter of Enemy of the State.
Washington D.C. labour lawyer, Robert Clayton Dean (Will Smith), is an
ordinary guy. Dean lives a stable and uncomplicated life with his wife
(Regina King) and kid, and he has a good job. I don't think he could ask
for anything more. That is, until he bumps into a long unseen friend Zavitz
(Jason Lee) one day.
It turns out that Zavitz, while shooting video of migrating ducks
accidentally records the murder of a high-positioned congressman. The
congressman is the head of a committee overlooking a privacy bill in the
House that could possibly strip all Americans of their privacy. This bill
would let the government, especially the National Security Agency, install
wiretaps and spy on any American. The congressman is highly opposed to the
bill and has the ears of many in the committee. NSA official, Reynolds (Jon
Voight) does not like the congressman's stand on the bill and he'll do
anything to get it passed -- including killing the congressman so that a
more supportive person can step up to head the committee.
Zavitz, on the run from some rogue NSA guys who are under the lead of
Reynolds, leaves the incriminating tape with Dean, without Dean knowing it.
When the NSA guys figure out that Dean has the tape, they go after Dean -
who still doesn't know that he has the tape. The NSA guys tear up Dean's
life. They split his marriage with a fake affair. They cause Dean to lose
his job. Dean's credit cards are cancelled. Dean's identity is all lost.
Dean seeks the help of an informer known only as Brill (Gene Hackman).
Brill is a shadowy figure who works in an abandoned warehouse and surrounds
his workplace with copper mesh to keep the government from listening in.
Brill, a former NSA man, knows how the NSA works and knows how to defeat
them at their own game. Brill is Dean's only hope.
Enemy of the State focuses on two long and exhilarating chase scenes. The
film then tops itself off with one, though highly improbable, shootout.
This wraps the film up nicely, but it feels contrived - though, at that
point, who cares because it was a hell of a shootout.
Brill serves as the spokesperson for screenwriter, Macroni. He talks about
how the government has an underground monitoring station that can listen to
any of our telephone conversations. He lets Dean know about the hundreds of
satellites overhead that can track anyone's movements. He talks about how
we're all wired in some way and how we cannot escape the eyes and ears of
the US government.
What is surprising is that most of what Brill talks about can be possible -
frighteningly possible. Like it or not, there's no way to not leave a
digital footprint. Use your ATM card, charge something, or make a telephone
call and all of these things will leave a digital footprint. Someone,
including our own government, can track what we do because of this. Perhaps
the government isn't spying on us, but how can we be sure? As Brill points
out, if call someone and use one of a hundred catchphrases such as "bomb",
"president" or "Allah", a computer will mark your telephone call as a
priority and queue it to be analyzed by a human.
Enemy of the State is not a thought-provoking film, but it does raise some
questions that stick long after leaving the theatre. For the most part, it
is an action film, and as such it is outstanding. Coming from producer
Jerry Bruckheimer (Armageddon, The Rock, Top Gun) and directed by Tony
Scott (Crimson Tide, Top Gun) Enemy of the State is an all out
roller-coaster ride that doesn't take a second to catch its breath.
Scott is a director whom I take a liking to. He has a definite flair to his
direction and he really shines with Enemy of the State. Scott pulls out
every trick from his director's bag for this movie. Using sped up/slowed
down film, strange satellite footage, and many quick cuts, Scott polishes
this film until it's so shiny that the audience can see their reflection on
the screen. Like Michael Bay's The Rock, Scott keeps Enemy of the State
moving at such a speed that the audience isn't left with any time to think
about all the gaping holes in the script. Scott puts out an entertaining
film that is a good two-hour diversion.
Will Smith has established that he is a versatile actor. His onscreen
charisma is what carried Independence Day and Men in Black. And he showed
that he's good with action in Bad Boys. In Enemy of the State, Smith tries
something new: a regular guy. Smith holds up well throughout the film;
kudos to Smith for a good performance.
Gene Hackman is always a joy to see on screen and with Enemy of the State
he's no different. In this second film with Tony Scott, Hackman gets to do
something different. In his first film with Scott, Crimson Tide, Hackman
was the captain of a nuclear submarine who was expected only to know where
and when to fire the nuclear missiles. His character in Crimson Tide was no
genius, but his character in Enemy of the State is. And Hackman handles the
part just fine. Hackman has a big screen presence and every time he's on
screen everything else falls to the wayside, including Will Smith.
By far, Enemy of the State is the most entertaining action film of this
fall season. With its spit-shine polished looks and its two lead actors,
Enemy of the State will entertain many with its visions of paranoia. Don't
Miss Enemy of the State and remember:
It's not paranoia if they're really after you.
[Rated R  Language and Violence. Running Time: 128 Minutes]
 recipe for a hard boiled review:  one egg, two cups water, a pot,
 a helluva attitude, and a guy who loves the cinema.
 i'm your hard boiled movie guide.

Author
David Nusair
Starring Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Seth Green, Jason Lee, Jon Voight
Will Smith can be a charistmatic actor.  In "The Fresh Prince of Bel-Air",
his NBC sitcom that ran for seven years, he was always engaging and funny.
In his breakthrough movie role from "Independence Day", he was essentially
playing the same character as his sitcom, but he was engaging and the
audience was rooting for him.  Now, with "Enemy of the State", Smith is
trying to become a Real Actor, and quite frankly, he doesn't have the
talent for it.
I don't want to be one of those critics that needlessly slags actors, but
I'm afraid that it is a necessary evil in this case.  Smith just isn't
convincing in his role as a D.C. attourney on the run from nefarious
government agents.  He always seems to be going through the motions.  And,
worst of all, he has virtually no screen presence.  Whenever he's on
screen, the viewer doesn't feel compelled to watch him, and when you're
the star of the film, that's deadly.  Imagine how riveting this movie
could have been had a talented young actor like Edward Norton taken
Smith's role.
Despite Smith's awkward and unconvincing performance, "Enemy of the State"
isn't all bad.  There are some great, heart-pounding action scenes that
had me on the "edge of my seat".  Tony Scott, who's previous credits
include "Crimson Tide" and "Top Gun", is a master at filming fast-paced
action sequences.  And unlike Michael Bay, director of this summer's awful
"Armageddon", he doesn't feel the need to include thousands of cuts.  He
understands that fast cuts do not always equal fast action.  Bay could
surely take a lesson from Scott, since their styles are so similar.
Alongside the good action sequences, there are some decent actors here,
particuarly Gene Hackman.  Hackman has long been one of my favorites, and
he delivers another brilliant performance.  He blows Smith away every time
he is on screen.  Perhaps they should have gotten a lesser actor to make
Smith look good, because as it is, Hackman reminds the audience of what a
good actor can do with lesser material.
And it is lesser material.  The script, while interestingly plotted,
contains simply *horrible* dialogue.  Smith's character is constantly
wisecracking, even in situations that no sane man could make light of. 
And the ending is a complete cop-out.  It's as if David Marconi, the
screenwriter, had painted himself into a corner with all these different
characters, he didn't know what to do.  I won't spoil it, but let's just
say that the movie ends exactly the same way Scott's "True Romance" did. 
One final complaint:  Gabriel Byrne.  Here is an excellent actor reduced
to a three minute cameo as an assassin.  Even in his miniscule part, he
manages to exude more charisma than Smith manages in the entire two hour
running time.  What a waste.
"Enemy of the State" is a not-too-boring diversion, but given all the
talent involved, both behind the camera and in front, it's a real
disappointment.

Author
Jeffrey Huston
Directed by Tony Scott. Produced by Don Simpson and Jerry Bruckheimer.
Screenplay by David Marconi. Distributed by Touchstone Pictures.
Running time: 130 minutes. Release date: November 20, 1998.
(Jeffrey Huston's URL for this review, complete with pictures:
http://www.impactprod.org/people/huston/enemy.htm )
As with a delicious gallon of Grade-A milk, it's sad to see a good movie
turn sour. Okay, maybe that's not the best analogy, but you get the picture.
A movie draws you in. It excites and intrigues you. Then it lets you down.
That, in a nutshell, is producer Jerry Bruckheimer's ("Armageddon", "Con
Air") latest film "Enemy of the State".
It is a promising re-teaming of Bruckheimer and director Tony Scott who
collaborated previously on such entertaining and engrossing hits like "Top
Gun" and "Crimson Tide". But the promise is broken after the film's first
hour, resulting in a conspiracy thriller that is ultimately lacking in
suspense.
"Enemy of the State" tries to create a sense of "X-Files" governmental
paranoia minus the UFO's and paranormal. The story involves a lawyer named
Robert Clayton Dean (Will Smith) who is unknowingly thrust into a
high-stakes game of governmental cover-up. A chance encounter with an old
college acquaintance results in Dean obtaining possession of a videotape
that shows the murder of a U.S. Senator.
The catch is that the senator was murdered by a group of renegade FBI agents
led by a top official at the National Security Agency, Thomas Brian Reynolds
(Jon Voight). The problem is that Dean is unaware that he possesses this
videotape. So when Dean becomes the focus of an unrelenting manhunt by
Reynolds and his cronies, he naturally runs from this pursuit with paranoia
surging through his veins. Dean's only hope for survival is an ex-NSA agent
named Brill (Gene Hackman), a renegade patriot who is keen to Reynolds and
his crimes.
The main problem with "Enemy of the State" is that it shows all of its cards
way too soon. After about an hour, we the audience are made aware of every
bit of necessary information concerning the plot and its characters. Robert
Clayton Dean and Brill are still in the dark, but we aren't. We know exactly
what they're running from and why they are in this situation.
Because of this, virtually all suspense is eliminated. By knowing
everything, it disables us from completely feeling Dean's paranoia.  As a
result, the film's final hour ends up being just a series of chases and
cloak & dagger rendezvous.
These scenes are tense for the characters, because they don't know what they
are dealing with. We do, however, and as such most of the tension is
eliminated.  "Enemy of the State" goes from being a taut, exciting,
suspenseful thriller to one that simply plods along as a technical cinematic
exercise.
The cast is solid, with good performances being turned in by most of the
leads. Will Smith makes up for his minimal acting range with charisma and
sincerity. His fear and determination are very believable and he never seems
out of his league around the likes of Oscar winners Gene Hackman and Jon
Voight. Hackman is solid as always, effortlessly finding the right emotional
level for every line and scene. It's too bad he doesn't show up until about
an hour into the film, and then only sporadically until the end.  Voight is
good as the film's bad guy.  But having played the heavy in such recent
films as "The Rainmaker" and "Mission: Impossible", this performance by
Voight is beginning to feel a little redundant.
The two lead actresses fare rather well in their roles.  Regina King ("Jerry
Maguire") brings her trademark energy to the role of Dean's opinionated wife
Carla.  Lisa Bonet (TV's "The Cosby Show") resurrects her career as Rachael
Banks, an informant for Dean.   Bonet's subtle yet vulnerable turn here is a
very pleasant surprise.
While suspense in the story may be lacking, the filmmaking is not. Dan
Mindel's photography mixes classic Bruckheimer visuals with fast dollies and
jerky zooms. This adds a flavor of high-tech espionage and covert
surveillance that is necessary to the mood of the film.
Chris Lebenzon's editing is jarring and uneven, but only when it needs to
be.  "Enemy of the State" is well produced from a technical standpoint, but
it doesn't have a suspenseful story to support it.
Screenwriter David Marconi and director Tony Scott did the film a disservice
in revealing everything about Dean's plight within the film's first hour.
They would have better served the story (and its audience) by doing one of
two things:
For the suspense that "Enemy of the State" lacks, blame should not be
assessed to Will Smith. He does a fine job as an innocent yet frightened and
paranoid man who is thrust into the overwhelming, lethal world of
governmental espionage. His character doesn't know until the final quarter
of the film why they are after him. Unfortunately for us, we pretty much
know after the first scene.
URL for Jeffrey Huston's film review site "Believe Me":
http://www.impactprod.org/people/huston/core.htm

Author
Arnold Kim
It seems privacy can often be at a premium these days.  a person's credit and 
their purchasing history can be found on the computer.  Bugs and cameras 
have been shrunk down to the microscopic level.  The private life of the 
president is now a national issue.   "Enemy of the State", directed by Tony 
Scott, takes advantage of this paranoia, and runs with it.  
Will Smith, in what is his first true starring role, plays the role of Robert 
Dean, a young Washingto DC lawyer who is slipped a videotape of the 
assasination of  congressman, and other government members implicated 
in the video attempt to track him down and capture him.  All this is done 
via the technology of a national security agency.  
Thsi film successfully preys on the idea that someone, somewhere, is 
watching our every move.  It could be from some hidden camera in the 
wall, or a bug planted in the heels of our shoes.  No matter where you run, 
we'll always know where you are.  The predator knows exactly where the 
prey is going to move, and this sort of suspense done at a breakneck speed 
creates some fairly pulse-pounding moments.  It's an elaborate chase, and 
you feel ike you're just as much the victim.  
"Enemy" features probably as quality a cast as an action film can get.  Will 
Smith is fine as Dean, occasionally showing some of the comic wit he has, 
as well as pulling off the innocent everyman role effectively.  Gene 
Hackman plays the former security agent who helps Dean out in his flee 
from his hunters.  He's not the cookie cutter expert-who-bails-out-the-hero 
type character seen in films- he is portrayed with the appropriate 
conviction.  Also commendable is Jon Voigt as the politician implicated in 
the video, as cold as a member of Congress can get.  
The only major problem I found with the film is that it does tend to drag on 
a bit later on and found myself getting a bit bored at about the last half hour 
or so.  Some of the time perhaps could have been better spent rejuvenating 
the plot a little.  An extra plot twist couldn't have hurt the film, since it for 
the most part runs in one direction the whole way.  
For the most part, however, the film is exciting and breathless, and much of 
the chase was suspense at 100 mph, and that overcomes the occasionally 
lagging plot.  Solid performances, an intruiging and relatively original idea, 
and execution of that idea at high speeds make for a quality action film that 
can even make you think once in a while about being watched.  On a scale 
of 1 to 10, I give it a solid 7.  
Lets hope this review isn't secretly monitored...

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director: Tony Scott
Cast: Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Jon Voight, Jack Black, Jake Busey,
Gabriel Byrne, Scott Caan, Loren Dean
Screenplay: David Marconi, Aaron Sorkin, Henry Bean, Tony Gilroy
Producers: Jerry Bruckheimer
Runtime:128 min. 
US Distribution: Touchstone
Rated R: language, violence
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Producer Jerry Bruckheimer employs a lot of big-name directors to make
his films, but all of his movies have a similar feel:  they're all
fast-paced, featuring quick-cuts and lots of close-ups.  The last few,
including Armageddon, Con Air, and The Rock, are all huge, loud, and
enormously expensive films that not only do their job as action
pictures, but manage to have a little bit of substance behind the
flash.  And though Bruckheimer is obviously a man who wants to make
money, it's refreshing to see a producer at least marginally interested
in putting out quality entertainment for audiences.
Directed by Tony Scott, Enemy of the State is a fast-paced action film
that has all of the elements I described above:  true, it is primarily
an action film, but it's not excessively violent, and it actually has
scenes that develop the characters.  By the end, you don't feel like
you've watched a two-hour chase sequence featuring cardboard cutouts. 
In fact, Enemy of the State is one of the more plausible action films to
come around in a while, for it adds an element that we are all familiar
with -- fear of our government.  
Lawyer Robert Dean (Will Smith) didn't have any particular fear of the
government.  However, one day, as he's shopping for his wife (Regina
King), he's confronted by an old friend of his (Jason Lee) who has just
been chased by a bunch of NSA officials.  Just before getting killed,
Dean's friend sticks a digital video into Dean's shopping bags (while
Dean isn't looking).  Dean, unaware that he is the possessor of a video
that features the murder of a high-powered political official, is
suddenly being targeted by NSA officials as a conspirator.
It's your typical wrong-man plot, with a few interesting twists and a
lot of good acting.  For a lot of the film, Dean has no idea that he
did, in fact, have what the NSA wanted.  Everyone thinks he's playing
dumb, when, in reality, he just has no idea what's going on.  It turns
out that the politician who gets killed in the video is opposed to a
national security bill that will limit the privacy of Americans;
interestingly enough, Enemy of the State does a good job bringing out
this theme of paranoia, and ends up one of the more thoughtful action
films to come along this year.  
I've always thought Scott was a good director, and here he shows a lot
of style and a real flair for fast-paced action.  There are a lot of
technical details in the film, and a lot of shots of satellites hovering
above the earth; and while much of the information reeks of BS, an
acceptable amount of it is believable.  The overhead shots of a chase
sequence that takes place on the roof of an apartment building are
spectacular; Scott uses a lot of strange, off-putting camera angles, and
the result is a swift movie that almost never slows down.
The acting is terrific; Will Smith is a very good performer, and makes
a great everyman in this role.  He's likable and funny, and screams
lines like, "I don't know what you're talking about!" with ease.  Also
great is Gene Hackman, who plays an ex-NSA member who ends up helping
Dean.  King, as the wife, is pretty darn good, as is Lisa Bonet as an
ex-lover of Dean's (both women have surprisingly good roles for an
action film).  Jon Voight, as the evil politician behind everything,
sneers very well, but manages to add a level of depth vacant from most
action film bad guys.  There are a lot of good actors in small roles,
including Jason Robards, Gabriel Byrne, and Stuart Wilson.
Enemy of the State is several steps above standard action fare, because
of top-rate work in both production and acting.  It's not a perfect
action movie; there might be one chase too many, and there aren't as
many laughs as I was expecting from a film starring Will Smith.  In
addition, the final shootout doesn't live up to the rest of the film. 
But these are minor issues; this picture succeeds not only because of
Scott's tight, take-no-prisoners direction, but because of a smart
script that has both characters and theme.  I was entertained by Enemy
of the State, but I was also prompted to consider its claims:  how much
control does the government actually have over us?  It's nice to know
that a big producer like Jerry Bruckheimer has learned that it's
possible to make a lot of money with a movie of high quality; let's just
hope that he continues to provide first-rate entertainment like this.

Author
Homer Yen
I have a friend who works for the NSA, a pseudo-government agency
that, from the looks of this film, has the ability to shadow your life
without you ever really knowing it.  Whenever I ask him what he does
there, he can only reply, `pretty cool stuff.'  I guess that if he
actually did any of the things that was depicted in the film, it would
be classified' as pretty cool.  Apparently, they can hear your
cellular phone conversations, access your bank statements, and put you
under the watchful eyes of hidden cameras 24 hours a day.  Privacy no
longer exists if the NSA enters your life.  As the watchdog for our
beloved citizens, their powers could get pretty scary if they had more
authority to initiate wire taps and other methods of surveillance. 
And that's what Director Reynolds (Jon Voight) seems to want.  To
promote his the-NSA-must-know-all' philosophy, he will use every
means possible, including the execution of a key congressman and any
other enemy' that stands in his way.
Unbeknownst to Robert Dean (Will Smith), he has been labeled an enemy
when sensitive information is passed on to him.  He doesn't even know
that he possesses this information, but soon becomes the target of a
massive manhunt.  Hiding is virtually impossible.  They bug his house
and make use of an eye-popping number of surveillance equipment, while
a platoon of agents discretely follow the lawyer wherever he goes.  
Steps are taken to discredit him by manipulating the media.  They also
make it difficult for him to escape by, among other things, canceling
all of his credit cards.
Why is everyone chasing him?  What secrets does he possess which
causes the NSA to invade his life?  He meets up Brill (Gene Hackman),
an unlikely ally with an enigmatic background.  He is a former NSA
operative and can help Dean stay ahead of them as well as help him
find the answers to his questions.
While "Enemy" is more-or-less suspenseful and showy, if you strip away
the techno-babble and the Morse code-like sound effects whenever
satellites are being repositioned, you basically have a conventional
manhunt.  Will Smith is reliably affable as a man looking for answers,
who has to rely on help from questionable sources as well as enjoy a
little bit of luck.  And I enjoyed Hackman as the bitter recluse who
understood all too well about how the government stealthfully lives
among us.  But consider this film more of a message rather than a high
octane vehicle that pushes its way from one scene to another.  How
much of our own constitutional freedoms are individuals willing to
give up for the sake of national security?   Maybe the State is its
own worst enemy.


Author
Tim Voon
Cast: Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Jon Voight, Regina King, Loren Dean,
Jake Busey, Barry Pepper, Tom Sizemore, Lisa Bonet, Gabriel Byrne.
Screenplay: David Marconi.
Director: Tony Scott.
For a movie that was initially intended for Tom Cruise, it hasn't turned
out half bad with Will Smith instead. Will isn't the likely candidate
for any form of conspiracy campaign, but does well  toning down his
usual smugness, for a serious dramatisation of a lawyer being hunted
down by the state. The ENEMY OF THE STATE is a good thriller, although
reliant on the mere chance occurrence of several missing videotapes in
order for the ending to work out so finely. Despite this over-contriving
of the plot to bring about the conclusion, there is little else to
complain about. The viewer senses the terror of being continuously
watched, chased, monitored by video cameras, bugging devices,
state-of-the-art satellites - all pitted against an innocent man who
stumbles across a conspiracy by accident. This sort of the movie works
on one's paranoia, and will no doubt fuel public opinion against
government intrusions on privacy. One doesn't sleep easy knowing how
easy it is for every part of your life to become open to the eyes of the
world. This movie fares much better than THE NET which follows a similar
premise.

Author
Kevin Patterson
Tony Scott's ENEMY OF THE STATE is like a very carefully constructed and
reliable machine. The film skillfully assembles all the standard parts of a
paranoid action thriller, puts them in exactly the right places, flicks the
"on" switch, and then justs let the thing run. It has clichs out the wazoo
(innocent citizen happening to witness a government-sanctioned murder,
protagonist as target of a high-tech smear campaign, car chase in an
underground tunnel, exploding warehouse, etc.), but this is the kind of
movie that reminds us why clichs become clichs in the first place:
because, when used properly, they work.
ENEMY OF THE STATE effectively blends elements of two types of thrillers:
the "stolen-identity" story, in which nefarious forces use technological
forgery to undermine someone's credibility and take away his financial and
legal resources, and the chase movie, in which the protagonist is
constantly on the run from the bad guys. That protagonist is Robert Dean
(Will Smith), a labor attorney who accidentally winds up in possession of a
tape documenting the murder of a Congressman. The murder had been ordered
by an NSA operative named Reynolds (Jon Voight), who needed the Congressman
out of the way in order to pass a bill that would legalize widespread audio
and video surveillance of the American population. Eventually Dean is
joined by Brill (Gene Hackman), a rogue NSA agent, as the two of them try
to turn the tables on Reynolds' men.
This is the second big-budget action movie of 1998 to be produced by Jerry
Bruckheimer, ARMAGEDDON being the first. ENEMY OF THE STATE is a slightly
better film than ARMAGEDDON, if nothing else because the suspense depends
on a cat-and-mouse routine between Dean, Brill, and Reynolds rather than on
the efforts of the protagonists to combat a giant piece of CGI. The initial
chase scenes are the high point of the movie, as Scott keeps the audience
on the edge of their seats with quick cuts between the action itself, the
hi-tech video feeds from the NSA satellites, and the hackers at NSA
headquarters monitoring the situation. Screenwriter David Marconi also
deserves some credit, however, for his presentation of Dean's family life,
which seems to be mostly happy but not without its problems. The dialogue
is nothing to write home about, but it is at least realistic and mostly
devoid of the irritating clichs that populate many an action script.
Aside from a far-fetched and unnecessarily bloody ending, the major flaw in
ENEMY OF THE STATE is that Scott and Bruckheimer don't recognize when they
have too much of a good thing. The scenes of the NSA agents pursuing Dean
with the help of various hi-tech gadgets start to grow repetitive after a
while, and as a result the movie really starts to drag in the middle
section until Brill shows up. While not as annoying as the endless
camera-shaking in the final hour of ARMAGEDDON, these scenes still left me
thinking that Bruckheimer and his directors really ought to open a
dictionary and look up "restraint" some time. Fortunately, things pick up
again towards the end when Dean and Brill hatch a scheme to outwit the NSA.
ENEMY OF THE STATE is the kind of movie that really makes me wish I had a
**3/4 rating: it's better than any of the **1/2 films I've seen this year,
but not as good as any of the other *** films. Since I saw it on Christmas
Day, I've decided to be generous.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
Film Reviews Archive:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Author
Jerry Saravia
With a title as generic as the movie itself, this latest Jerry Bruckheimer
production is not as headache-inducing as "Armageddon" but it may still leave
you with a slight migraine. That is not to say that "Enemy of the State" isn't
fun, it is, but in a crudely packaged, sensationalistic way. 
Let's consider the plot for a moment. Will Smith plays a labor lawyer named
Robert Clayton Dean, whose life is already in peril before the plot thickens.
He's facing problems with the Mob regarding a videotape and a troubling
association with an ex-girlfriend (Lisa Bonet). By chance, he abruptly meets an
old college friend of his (Jason Lee from "Chasing Amy") who slips a videotape
into Dean's shopping bag. This tape contains footage of the murder of a
congressman, and it is up to the high-ranking National Security Agency (NSA)
officials to get their hands on it. This agency is run by Thomas Reynolds (Jon
Voight, the villain du jour), and he's eager to get the tape back since he was
at the murder scene. 
It's a Kafkaesque downfall for Dean, who can't use any of his credit cards and
can't convince his wife (Regina King) that he's innocent of all these charges
they've drummed up in the media, including an alleged affair with his
ex-girlfriend. Worse yet, Dean's house and his entire life is bugged right
through with high-tech surveillance equipment. Dean hides out and finds a
certain Mr. Brill (Gene Hackman) who used to work for the NSA and can outwit
any of those officials. Still, Dean is only a lawyer and makes stupid mistakes,
like calling his wife. Wake up Dean, the phones are bugged too! 
This film is illogical and senseless, but it moves at a fast clip. There are
enough comical surprises by Smith, though the script makes him a little too
bland for my tastes. He has a hectically funny scene where he pretends to be
hotel hospitality, and undresses before a hysterical Oriental couple while the
NSA are trying to catch him. Some scenes are unforgivably implausible, such as
seeing Dean running down a tunnel in a white robe (wouldn't any car stop?); the
NSA killing everyone they question except for Dean; a laughable Tarantino-like
shootout between the Mob and the NSA, and so on. 
"Enemy of the State" is a high-tech conspiracy thriller with no surprises or
sense of real, imminent danger. It is too dependent on loud explosions and
gimmicky, electronic music to remind us that we should feel tense. The outline
of the plot is very similar to Coppola's classic "The Conversation," which was
a deftly handled character study relying on dialogue and a quiet, understated
style to convey the madness of privacy invasion. The other connection is the
frenetic performance by Gene Hackman as a bug expert, practically the same role
he played in "The Conversation," but with far less subtlety this time around. 
All in all, this is an overdone popcorn thriller in the fast-cut, explosive
style of producer Jerry Bruckheimer and director Tony Scott ("Top Gun"). It'll
keep you awake and you'll enjoy Smith's precious few quips, but you'll have
forgotten about it by the next day. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general coplaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Author
Steve Rhodes
Ah, men and their toys.  As we learn in ENEMY OF THE STATE, NSA
(National Security Agency) has the best.  They're to die for.
Literally.
Producer Jerry Bruckheimer, the king of the action movies from BEVERLY
HILLS COP to ARMAGEDDON, trots out his latest movie, ENEMY OF THE STATE,
and it's a dandy.  Fast-paced and full of rapid cuts among high tech
gadgetry, the movie, directed by Tony Scott (TOP GUN and CRIMSON TIDE),
throws believability out the window and happily lets the audience just
kick back and have some fun.
As the story opens, a senator, played earnestly by Jason Robards,
refuses to support a new telecommunications bill that permits unlimited
wiretapping by our nation's federal agencies.  Jon Voight, a bimodal
actor who either goes for creepy caricature or sincere intelligence,
plays NSA section head Thomas Brian Reynolds with impressive credibility
and enough brainpower to hold his own among the NSA nerds.
When the senator will not agree to support the bill, Reynolds and his
NSA goons kill him.  As an environmental scientist named Zavitz, CHASING
AMY's Jason Lee accidentally videotapes the murder.  A small army of bad
guys sweep down on Zavitz, but he manages to drop the tape in Robert
Dean's shopping bag at an expensive lingerie shop.  This permits the
movie's photogenic star, Will Smith, who plays Dean, to hobnob with sexy
models, dressed only in revealing bras and panties.  And it gives an
opening for one of the funny script's best interchanges.  Dean later
jokes that the reason he was there was to pickup some items since he
likes to cross-dress on the weekends.
The rest of the movie is one long, high-tech, cat and mouse chase with
Reynolds and company going after Dean.  Will Smith, being Will Smith,
semi-plausibly plays a guy who can elude dozens of guys with guns,
tracking devices, helicopters and spy satellites.  They throw everything
but nuclear weapons at him, but he comes out almost unscathed.
The real star in the movie isn't Smith, Voight, or Gene Hackman, who
shows up at the midway point, but it's the technology.  The movie spends
most of its time and bucks on demonstrations of advanced technical
hardware.  And it also provides somber lessons in ways to avoid being
trapped in our government's crosshairs.
Spy satellites, aimed at us, are so powerful that they can observe the
stains on our clothes.  We learn that you should never look up,
otherwise they will get a make on you.  One shouldn't shop at
convenience stores or any place with a surveillance camera.  And most of
all, never use a phone, even a pay phone.
Since Reynolds can't find the tape, he sets out to destroy Dean's life.
When a rogue agency goes after you, your reputation is history faster
than you can cry foul.  Dean's job and marriage quickly go into the
toilet as Reynolds fabricates a stream of lies against him.
The always-fascinating Gene Hackman shows up in the movie's second half,
playing a mysterious, free-lance investigator named only Brill.  With
black, horn-rimmed glasses and a quarter-inch haircut, he's the spitting
image of your grandfather's fishing buddy.  Brill, dressed in
thrift-shop clothes rejects, is, of course, an ex-NSA agent who hates
and distrusts his old employer.
The movie, which becomes highly repetitious, gets a second wind at the
end.  The film's creative last half-hour, when Dean and Brill turn
tables on NSA, is easily the best part.  It's the sort of ending that's
liable to set audiences cheering.  It did ours.  As intriguing as ENEMY
OF THE STATE is, it is just as forgettable.  Entertainment without
pretensions of being anything more, a typically satisfying Jerry
Bruckheimer movie.
ENEMY OF THE STATE runs 2:08.  It is rated R for violence and profanity
and would be fine for teenagers.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Joy Wyse
Starring: Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Jon Voight, Lisa Bonet, Regina King,
et al  
Will Smith is the star of this movie mainly because he's the only one who
has more than a couple of scenes. The exception is Gene Hackman who
appears halfway into the story.   The plight of Robert Dean [Will Smith]
is one that could happen to anyone.  That's what makes this movie so
scary.  It's not the explosions, or the car chases.  It's the realization
that our privacy is in danger.  In this age of computers and advanced
electronics, our lives are open books-if you are the one who knows where
to find the book.
Dean, a young practicing attorney, is in the middle of a law suit
involving an Italian `enforcer' who threatens his life because of evidence
Dean has that could send him back to prison.  At the same time, another
plot is beginning to unfold, and through a set of circumstances, Dean
becomes an unknowing player in a political battle involving the `Right to
Privacy'.  He learns first hand just how susceptible we have all become. 
At first it's small things like having his credit card refused at a hotel.
Soon, as the conspiracy grows, he realizes that the Italian group is not
capable of such extensive harassment. 
Jon Voight seems to be creating a new image for himself as the epitome of
upper-class corruption.   He has that trustworthy-but-misleading look.  As
he's playing a political figure, it makes you wonder about our own
security.   Lisa Bonet and Regina King are the two women in Dean's life. 
Lisa is a former girl friend, from his days at Georgetown.  Regina is his
wife and mother of their 8-year-old son.  The story is so well written
that, at times, I wasn't sure which female would end up with him.
Gene Hackman, the co-star, is wonderful.  He's totally believable.  It's
just a shame that it takes so long for him to appear. The explanation
about his past is told too quickly and, at the end, you're still a bit in
the dark about him.
 Other cast members are excellent in their roles although most of them
have nothing more than cameos.  It makes you wonder why some are given
star billing and others are not.
The movie isn't bad.  It's an OK way to spend a couple of hours.  But
it's neither the actors nor the plot that you'll remember.  You'll just
keep asking yourself how much privacy you really have.  It's worth seeing
for that reason alone.  I give it a B-.  And, I would watch it again,
probably on TV.

Author
Luke Buckmaster
Cast: Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Jon Voight, Regina King, Lisa Bonet,
Loren Dean, Ian Hart, Jake Busey, Barry Pepper, Jason Lee, Gabriel
Byrne, Tom Sizemore
Director: Tony Scott
Screenplay: David Marconi
Australian theatrical release: January 7, 1999
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 stars
It is always a good sign that a thriller is working when you start to
believe that anything happening on the screen is something that could
happen to you.  Achieving this much is not an easy task for anyone, so
you can imagine my surprise when Tony "Top Gun" Scott, Will Smith and a
writer with only one previous film under his belt managed to pull it
off.  Not only that, but they've also done a darn good job.  Scott's
tense direction of David Marconi's paranoid and upbeat screenplay gives
the film structure, whilst a bunch of strong performances from a
talented cast give it character.
In fact, I found it amazing that Scott was able to make his three lead
actors - Will Smith, Gene Hackman and Jon Voight - work so well.  Smith
tackles an out of character "serious" role and finds stable ground as
the film's anchor.  Although Hackman is rarely powerful, his work in
Enemy of the State is not to be underestimated.  And as for Jon Voight,
he is finally back to the standard he set in Mission Impossible, once
again reprising his role as everybody's least popular character (the
smug villain).
A mob goon gives Robert Clayton Dean (Will Smith) a tricky choice: fork
over some valuable information or get killed before the week's end.  You
can understand why this threat soon becomes the least of Dean's worries
after he finds himself unwittingly involved in something a little more
serious - a national conspiracy involving the work of shady NSA
(National Security Association) bureaucrat Thomas Reynolds (Jon Voight).
Reynolds is not your typical bad guy as he has a team of computer geeks
ready to do his dirty work for him, using the latest in computer
technology to hunt down and monitor anybody they please.  Everything
soon gets a little too much for Dean, as he begins to lose his loved
ones and eventually gets framed for murder.  Luckily for him, he
stumbles across a technological expert known as "Brill" (Gene Hackman),
and they eventually form an unlikely friendship as they try to escape
the inevitable showdown with Reynolds.
No doubt this is Brian De Palma and David Fincher territory.  Although
Scott can't find as much intrigue or suspense with his material as
Fincher did in The Game, he packs a lot of excitement into action
sequences.  There are two lengthy chase scenes that hold viewers'
attention for so long that watching them becomes uncomfortable.  The
first of these scenes sets a high standard for the rest of the film, and
features Chasing Amy's Jason Lee on the run from NSA goons.
Cinematographer Daniel Mindel captures the intensity of these moments
with deliberately computerized visuals.  When the "satellite cam" is
activated, he gives a refreshing new view of what is going on, and
reminds us of how big the characters are in comparison to the massive
modern world surrounding them.
With a running time of 140 minutes, it must be said that Enemy of the
State is not a good example of efficiency.  Will Smith's character is
casually developed for quite a lengthy amount of time before he finds
himself in extraordinary situations.  That is an interesting choice,
because many directors prefer to develop their characters when they are
placed outside of their comfortable environs (like in 1997's very clever
Breakdown, and Oliver Stone's U-Turn).  However Smith works well and so
does his character, and even cynics have to admire the way he has
successfully ditched his trademark supporting characters - aliens and
motor-mouth cops (at least for the time being).  In the transformation,
Smith has lost none of his charm, and now gives authenticity to his
presence.
If I could edit out any part of Enemy of the State, I'd get rid of its
prologue.  In this dreary opening scene, we are shown exactly what the
NSA will go to all lengths to protect.  Had Tony Scott revealed it to us
bit by bit, Enemy of the State might have become just that little bit
more clever.
But cleverness really isn't a problem when you take into account all
that Enemy of the State achieves.  Faults in the story and exaggerated
scenarios can be excused, since this film accomplishes the difficult
task of yielding an atmospheric, paranoid and thrilling version of our
modern world.  And even more impressive than that, Tony Scott makes
every inch of it believable.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback

Author
Edwin Jahiel
ENEMY OF THE STATE ** 1/2  Directed by Tony Scott. Written by David
Marconi. Ohrograohym Dan Mindel. Editing, Chris Lebenzon. Production
design, Benjamin Fernandez. Music, Trevor Rabin & Harry Gregson-Williams.
Produced by Jerry Bruckheimer. Cast: Will Smith (Bobby Dean); Gene Hackman
(Brill); Jon Voight (Reynolds); Lisa Bonet (Rachel Banks); Regina King
(Carla Dean); Ian Hart (Bingham); Jake Busey (Krug); Barry Pepper (Pratt);
Gabriel Byrne, Tom Sizemore, Jason Robards (the Congressman); Jason Lee
(photographer Zavitz), et al. A Touchstone release. 128 minutes. R
(violence)
On Friday the 13th my computer's display crashed terminally. On Friday the
20th, the computer was still disabled - so when, that day, I saw Enemy of
the State, the contrast between my electronic reality and the film's
flawless, dazzling magic made the movie both a techno-wonder and a
techno-thriller.
Congressman Jason Robards intends to vote against a Telecommunications
Security and Privacy Act.  Reynolds (John Voight), who is high up in the
NSA (National Security Agency), unable to change the Congressman's mind,
takes the easy way out. He has the man killed in a park, before his
(Voight's) eyes.
By one of those coincidences that transform films into movies, the murder
is recorded by a video camera hidden in the area by photographer Zavitz
(Jason Lee) who was monitoring geese. When he examines the footage and
alerts a magazine editor, his phone call is intercepted. The NSA apparently
bugs and monitors every human on this planet.
Immediately a chase begins, and not a wild goose one. Reynolds army of
computer-whizzes see and hear everything. Armed agents pursue the
photographer. As he   flees, by an amazing coincidence he runs into his
long time-no-see college classmate, labor lawyer Bobby Dean (Will Smith)
who is shopping for lingerie in a shop a la Victoria's Secret with
provocative Class 3 seductresses as saleswomen.
It's a blitz-meeting. The first thing Bobby does is -- improbably-- to give
his visiting card to Zavitz, who, in turn, secretly slips into Bobby's
purchases a diskette he has made of the incriminating video.
Zavitz dies. The God-like computers clue in the pursuers as to the
diskette. Bobby becomes their prey. It's like the familiar Alfred Hithcock
trick of The Wrong Man, except that unsuspecting Bobby does not realize
that he is the Right Man. Get my drift?
The lawyer is spied upon and hunted down. Bugs are planted on his clothes,
his shoes, a transmitter that duplicates his Mont Blanc pen, another that
duplicates his watch, etc. NSA's stock most likely includes bugs in Viagra
pills, toilet paper rolls, wedding rings, toenail clippers and all else.
Instant images and sounds show up on banks of monitors that also are hooked
up to cars, taxis, trucks, helicopters and a dedicated satellite 155 miles
up. Such astounding technology makes you a) suspend your disbelief;  b)
suspend it some more; c) wonder why Saddam Hussein has not yet been
terminated.
Actor Will Smith has declared: "You can be followed, watched, listened to
wherever you go; there's nothing the Government can't do. And the
technology we use in the movie is actually 10 years old. Fot this film, we
went to the CIA. We saw a recorder that you can implant in one of your
tooth fillings. We saw satellite surveillance of poppy fields. All the
technology that we show in the film exists for real. The concept of privacy
is obsolete."
Who am I not to believe him? I'll have to be cautious though next week,
when I see Nick, my dentist. But then, if there's nothing the government
can't do, why can't it govern?
Anyway, the NSA people or their equivalent either  must be furious or are
laughing themselves sick. Can't guess.
If the computer screens are crystal clear, the plot is not. At the end
Voight is revealed as a rogue super-spy, yet I can't decide whether his
henchpeople are co-conspirators or believe that they are kosher patriots.
Early on, during a sequence of long-distance miking  it became obvious that
the whole thing was derivative of Coppola's masterful The Conversation, but
done here in silly ways bereft of humanity, filmed like an MTV montage and
not involving the audience. So, who, later, pops up but Gene Hackman, the
tortured anti-hero of The Conversation!
He turns the movie's techno-jokes into one big inside joke.
Hackman, a techno-genius and former NSAer,  teams  up with Will for
defense, counter-attack -- and a happy ending.
I have revealed almost nothing of the gimmickry and the twists. These are
as numeorus as the bytes of your computer. At random, they include and
involve quid pro quos; vengeful Mafiosi; the luscious Lisa Bonet as Will's
college swetheart and now his informer; Will's wife, son and lapdog; Will
as a human fly; Will without pants; Will puzzling (and amusing) an Oriental
couple in their hotel room; a hotel fire; explosions; a mysterious can
driver; a sort of humongous "French Connection"-ish (which starred Hackman)
chase in a tunnel  and beneath it; split-second changes; and so on ad
infinitum and ad absurdum.
"Non-stop" takes on a new meaning. So do "techno-over-skill  and overkill."
Nonsense goes from mega to giga. Whatever truths are present, they are
treated so lavishly that they make King Kong, Mothra, Spielberg's dinosaurs
and James Bond feel real; by comparison the Enigma encryption machine of
World War II and the amazing spy-gadgets and surveillance of STASI (the
East German all-pervasive secret police) feel like advanced toys.
The realities behind Enemy of the State -- and I don't doubt that there are
several --go so much overboard that the movie becomes a fantasy whose
cautionary aspects are defanged.
As in the James Bond hyperboles, the silliness has a lining of humor which,
along with the exaggerations, does help pass the time. Will Smith is very
good. He performs with self-confidence, a twinkle in his eye, and no
mugging for the lens. His type of humor and cool reminds me of Eddie
Murphy's, minus the grin; or, going way back, of Clark Gable's, minus the
smugness.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Author
James Brundage
Directed by Tony Scott (Crimson Tide)
Starring Will Smith (Bad Boys), Gene Hackman (Antz), Jon Voight (Rosewood),
Lisa Bonet (Dead Connection), Regina King (Jerry Maguire), Tom Sizemore
(Saving Private Ryan), Jason Lee (Chasing Amy)
Well it's about time. Personally, I was getting fed up seeing these bloody
MTV directors going around thinking their making art when all their really
doing is boring us. Sure, they make great videos, but then they come back
and end up not wowing us for the more than three minutes that a music video
is supposed to. They have all the technical talent for the job, just not of
the creative ability to do the task put in front of them.
But now the reign of terror -- which has been dragging on since the video
music era ended and the market for music video directors dried up -- and
we're allowwed to finally view good work from the people. Tony Scott
(Crimson Tide, Top Gun, True Romance) is back with Jerry Bruckheimer
(Crimson Tide, Top Gun) going at forming a cool action flick.
Among the other reunions are Jerry Bruckheimer, Tony Scott, and Gene Hackman
(Crimson Tide) and Jerry Bruckheimer and Will Smith (Bad Boys), and all of
these people finally sat down, decided to get over the death of Don Simpson
and turn out a movie that was more than just spur of the moment fun-once
(Armageddon). It's just as cliched as every other flick they've ever turned
out, but hell, what is lacking in storyline is made up in the F/Xs and
editing, which make the quick cuts of the  Aussie Kiss or Kill look like
child's play.
Will Smith is a labor attorney who's life is invaded when an old college
buddy (Jason Lee: Mallrats, Chasing Amy) passes him a tape in a lingerie
store while running from evil NSA agents. The tape contains film of the
murder of a congressman who was opposed to a congressional bill that would
allow surveillance on everyone, and, of course, Jon Voight, Jamie Kennedy,
and a bunch of NSA cronies who look like they need to get laid end up
chasing after him.
On the run from the NSA, he hooks up with ex-NSA investigator Gene Hackman,
who will together get his life back while the bullets are shooting and the
techno-babble is flying.
So the plot's straight-foreword? So it rips off of the indie character drama
The End of Violence? Who cares? The thing that makes the film cool and
stylish isn't the work of Will Smith (which helps), or the MTV-generation
surveillance experts, to whom intelligence is just a game. It's the editing
that is the music video director's wet dream and the F/Xs that make even the
seasoned vetern smile.
They finally put the MTV experience to good use in the elaborate
surveillance scenes, in which you do everything from view the world from a
satellite's view to the same kind of oddball camera angles (i.e. from
buttons) as The Truman Show so wonderfully displayed.
You go through hundreds, perhaps thousands of shots in all of the chase
scenes, switching from surveillance camera to surveillance camera. The
paranoia is effective and infectious, the angles creative.
They have to start having new Oscars, ones for creativity in Cinematography
instead of ones that show just pretty camera angles. Why? Because someone
should get an award for this.

Author
James Sanford

 You don't have to go to a kids' movie this season to see bugs; there are
plenty on view in "Enemy of the State," the latest flashy, sterile package
to come off producer Jerry Bruckheimer's assembly line. Smartly playing off
public fears of illegal observation and wiretapping -- the villains here are
apparently all white Republican males, just to put a fine point on it all --
David Marconi's screenplay teems with high-tech surveillance equipment,
satellite observation and digital cameras hidden in trash bins and smoke
alarms. Too bad no one thought to have star Will Smith remake Rockwell's
"Somebody's Watching Me" as the movie's theme song.
 Smith, as Georgetown lawyer Robert Dean, is the unlikely target of all this
electronic voyeurism, thanks to a chance encounter with a former classmate
(Jason Lee) who unwittingly taped a murder and secretly passed along the
evidence to Dean. Within hours, Dean finds himself accused of everything
from having an affair with an old flame (a shopworn-looking Lisa Bonet) to
having murdered said mistress. His wife Carla (Regina King) throws him out,
his credit cards are invalidated and he finds himself in perpetual flight
from the sinister National Security Agency, headed up by cold-blooded Jon
Voight and Loren Dean.
 No one's going to mistake "Enemy" for "North By Northwest," but the picture
has enough juice to hold the interest for the first hour. By the time Gene
Hackman turns up as a former NSA agent who's been underground for the past
18 years though, the story is running out of places to go.
 Another stumbling block is Smith himself, a congenial actor but a limited
one. His emotional range does not extend to playing grief or to convincingly
portraying angry indignation. His best moments here come when he banters
with the always delightful King, whose skeptical reactions to her husband's
wild stories are priceless.
 Director Tony Scott steadfastly adheres to the first rule of the
Bruckheimer school of filmmaking, which is that no shot should be allowed to
last more than four seconds. The result is an overwhelming rush of imagery
which will either sweep you away or put you off. At least it's better suited
to this tangled tale than it was to the empty-headed, often baffling
"Armageddon."
 Though it's easy to trace the roots of "Enemy" back to such 1970s
suspensers as "Three Days of the Condor" or "The Conversation" (in which
Hackman's role was not far removed from his part here), Marconi can't come
up with a feasible finale to the chase, and the last ten minutes of the
movie provide a lame, bloody capper to a fairly exciting yarn.
James Sanford

Author
Cheng-Jih Chen

Now that X-Files has apparently become a quirky romantic comedy, sort
of like an alien-network executive hybrid of the first season of
"Friends" and "Twilight Zone" (e.g., "in a very special episode,
because of lost time, Mulder forgets Scully's birthday..."), we have to
go elsewhere to get our grand conspiracy-paranoia fix.  Conveniently, I
was on a quest to see the Star Wars preview, and "Enemy of the State"
just seemed like the right kind of movie to have "Every Saga Has a
Beginning..." pop up beforehand.  Sadly, that particular movie theater
insisted on putting the premiere with the Brad Pitt-as-Deadhead movie
instead of making my life more convenient.  Sadly, too, the paranoia
fix just wasn't there:  low-grade stuff, not worthy of the better
conspiracy movies.
Comparisons between "Enemy of the State" and the superb Coppola film,
"The Conversation" are inevitable.  Both feature Gene Hackman as a
professional eavesdropper, both indulge in hidden cameras and listening
through tiny microphones as their central activity.  The new movie pays
homage to its predecessor in its spy-on-people-in-park sequence, for
that matter.
But the older film maintains a dark, forbidding atmosphere throughout.
There's a sense of dread.  It was released around the time of
Watergate, after all.  This new film has plenty of adrenaline scenes,
stunts that couldn't easily be staged in the 1970s, wild chases that
arguably should have made the evening news but somehow didn't.  It's
neat eye candy, but, beyond a few tossed off platitudes about watching
the watchers and all that, there's nothing there but stage smoke and
flashing lights.  One almost thinks this was deliberate.  In "The
Conversation" there's one last bit surveillance, one nasty, creepy
episode of eavesdropping at the end.  There's also a final flourish of
watching at the end of "Enemy", but it's a happy, jokey scene: Gene
Hackman is sending Will Smith his vacation pictures.  Will Smith is not
in the least freaked out by this intrusion.  I suppose that if friends
are watching you then it's really no problem at all.
Feelings of grand conspiracy are also notably absent in "Enemy".  The
bad guys are a rogue unit of the NSA, led by someone with a grudge
because he wasn't promoted to Deputy Secretary of Spy Satellites And
Men's Room Stalls, or something.  On the whole, the NSA doesn't come
off as evil, just misguided in an office or two: there's even a scene
where the NSA chief makes a point of law regarding his agencies
activities, and invoking a threat of prison time for people who might
have done bad things.  The apparatus, in this case, isn't evil; there
are merely evil men.  Quite clearly, we're no longer in the age of
Watergate, despite the current impeachment hubbub.
I think there's one other free floating film reference in "Enemy", this
time to the disappointing Wim Wenders's state surveillance film, "The
End of Violence".  Well, maybe, but that's how I thought of Gabriel
Byrne's cameo.
At least in the Wim Wenders's, the act of surveillance is supposed to
have a distancing, depersonalizing quality.  All the computer screens
allow you to watch the world but not be a part of it.  In "Enemy", the
film makers indulge in the late 1990s ops center fetish, where flashing
screens, militarily precise orders and commando tactics have a certain
testosterone-heavy flourish.  The implied attractiveness of this sort
of world undermines whatever pretense the film might have about
eavesdropping being a wrong thing.
A few random notes, to close things out.  I find it interesting that
the vast surveillance apparatus portrayed in the movie can't be used
to, say, find Scud missiles in the Iraqi desert.  Certainly, a Scud is
somewhat larger than Will Smith.  Maybe they've been able to exploit
more of that alien technology they have over in Area 51.  I only offer
that as a possibility.  As someone who works with computers all day, I
have to note that many of the computer screens portrayed in this movie
had typical Hollywood user interfaces: lots of cool looking data
scrolling by, little of it useful, all of it capable of producing mongo
eye strain.  Surely, the NSA must have a good vision care program.
Much of the surveillance footage in the opening credits, I think, has
appeared in various Fox specials, "When 7-11 Clerks Attack", or
something similar.  One may note that much of this surveillance is
courtesy of private entities, ranging from your local bank's ATM booth
to the usual 7-11 security cam, up to the almost ubiquitous Los Angeles
area news chopper.  Little of that footage was from government
entities.  Yes, the people who put the credits together wanted to send
us a message about surveillance being pervasive in our society.  Well,
maybe that's what they wanted to say.

Author
David Sunga
Starring: Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Jon Voight, Lisa Bonet 
Ingredients: National Security Agency, innocent guy, video tape that
everyone wants 
Synopsis: 
In this thriller, Robert Dean (Will Smith) is an upscale lawyer and
family man who possesses a video tape containing incriminating film
footage of a mobster. The mobster threatens Dean with trouble if Dean
doesn't hand over the tape. When a desperate acquaintance bumps into
Dean, Dean unknowingly falls into accidental possession of a second,
unrelated tape wanted by an even more shadowy figure: a sinister
politician in charge of the NSA, a secretive American spy agency. In no
time, Dean finds himself on the run, chased by corrupt G-men, with his
posh former life turned completely upside down. Can Dean and his techno
ally Brill (Gene Hackman) finally figure out what's going on?
Opinion: 
Is there really an American intelligence organization called the
National Security Agency in charge of satellite imagery and electronic
surveillance? Actually yes. With offices worldwide, and an estimated 3
billion dollar budget, the NSA is one of the largest employers in the
state of Maryland and may be the world's primary employer of
mathematicians (read "computer codemakers and codebreakers"). The NSA
and the DIA (Defense Intelligence Agency) together control most of the
satellite and telecommunications defense reconnaissance taking place
anywhere in the world. 
ENEMY OF THE STATE asks an intriguing question: "What if the powerful
NSA targeted an ordinary civilian instead of terrorists?" Interesting
proposition, and it's what makes the movie so fun. Dean's life is
totally invaded by bugs, cameras, networked videocam, and satellite
intelligence. His credit records and bank records are tampered with. His
phones and those of his friends, family, and acquaintances are tapped.
Insidiously, the NSA even plants tracking devices on Dean's clothing and
shoes. ENEMY OF THE STATE excels at portraying this devilishly clever
surveillance. And thanks to TOP GUN director Tony Scott there is plenty
of fast paced action as well: running around, car chases, helicopters,
explosions, et cetera. The only really predictable part is the fate of
Dean's girlfriend Rachel (Lisa Bonet). ENEMY OF THE STATE is a decent
thriller with an interesting proposition and a catchy ending.  
Copyright  1998 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at 
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
Neil Smith
Rating: 80 %
Starring: Will Smith   Gene Hackman   Jon Voight
Director: Tony Scott
We in Cape Town have had our own experience of the type of surveillance as
portrayed in Enemy of the State. Six alleged Pagad G-Force members were
recently arrested following the monitoring of their movements by the
Business Against Crime surveillance cameras. Big Brother is definitely alive
and watching our every movement here in sunny South Africa.
In the director Tony Scott's movie Enemy of the State, the central question
is how much invasion of privacy the state can be allowed to do. Is it right
for the state to monitor every nook and cranny of its citizen's lives in the
pursuit of protecting the country against those who seek to harm her. The
movie kicks off when a prominent government official is assassinated because
he is preparing to oppose Jon Voight character, who is seeking more leeway
into prying in the daily lives of the ordinary citizens of the United
States. Will Smith, portrays a lawyer who also uses illegally obtained
surveillance footage to leverage himself and his clients into a position of
strength against some shady Mafia figures.
When through a chain of events Will Smith comes in possession of the
evidence of the government officials murder, his life is thrown into turmoil
as the corrupt NSA agency head uses all the means of the modern spy
apparatus to regain the evidence from him.
What really makes Enemy of the State such an engrossing movie is not the
slick editing and well staged action scenes which makes the Jerry
Bruckheimer production move at a cracking pace. The real success of the
movie is to show how computer geeks locked away in dark rooms surrounded by
the most expensive digital toys their governments can buy, can
systematically destroy the illusion of ordinary day to day life that we take
for granted.
The irony of Enemy of the State is that for Will Smith's character to
retrieve himself out of the predicament he is in, he has to fight fire with
fire. With the help of Gene Hackman's character he gains the necessary know
how to defeat the enemy. The message one can get from this, is heaven help
the poor souls who become the target of the government's focus to destroy
them. If you can't hack a computer or call up spy satellite to aid your
fight, you might as well give up.
I really enjoyed Enemy of the State. If only half of the things shown in the
movie are true, you better hope you don't stay in a country with a
government too keen in using the latest hi tech gadgets against their
citizens.
Neil Smith
Review courtesy of www.megavideo.co.za as well as www.dvdsa.co.za

Author
Mark O'Hara
A Film Review (in the form of a Q/A session) by Mark O'Hara
Q: Tony Scott has a reputation as a solid director of action films.  
Describe scenes from "Enemy of the State" that perpetuate this idea.
A:  After a well-done but rather conventional opening, the credits roll, 
probably unwatched, over frenetic vantages of Washington D.C. exteriors, 
spliced into shots of high-tech monitors, screens showing vehicles 
tracked from satellites 155 miles above the Earth.  Several times the 
camera freezes and jerks in perspective, creating an effect both 
fascinating and dizzying.  Early on we witness chase scenes that leave 
us panting.  One idea established early is that the government 
agents-gone-wrong - the ones doing the chasing - are ruthless and 
amoral;  they are young and fleet of foot, their short hair standing up 
with gel.  What is noticeable is the frequency of their failure, 
especially after they stop merely trying to trace Robert Dean (Will 
Smith) and really try to rub him out.  This is a necessary convention.  
The pursuit we see is tense and original, showing the tenacity of one 
man, usually on foot, trying to recover his life.  In a sequence inside 
a tunnel, Dean flees on foot as the agents converge;  in a slick stunt 
he slips just in time out of a ventilation shaft and back into the 
tunnel, where he once again uses his wits to disappear. The vehicle 
chases are not as stunning as those in "Bullitt" or "The French 
Connection," but the scenes of Dean - and especially of Dean and Brill 
(Gene Hackman) escaping together -- are well choreographed and essential 
to the theme of individuals triumphing over a culture in which privacy 
is taking heavy hits.  Scott shows his experience as a director with a 
penchant for action.
Q:  Describe camera angles or shots that establish a mood of tension. 
A:  There are nifty Dutch angles arranged during an argument between 
Dean and his wife Carla (Regina King), her canted face yelling back at 
him.  Clearly, Dean's life is being turned on end.  We watch a surplus 
of scenes taken from satellites, as the operatives for the National 
Security Agency track their prey, bodies or cars bracketed by target 
lines as if about to be smart-bombed.  Everywhere we look there is a 
sense of paranoia, including scenes in which the FBI is staking out an 
Italian restaurant.  In these aspects the film hearkens back to things 
Copollian - "The Godfather," "The Conversation," even the eerily dark 
"Apocalypse Now."  
Q:  Describe the qualities that veteran actors Jason Robards (as Senator 
Hammersly) and Gabriel Byrne (as the pseudo-Brill) bring to their brief 
roles.
A:  Their appearances are short but masterful.  As Hammersly, Robards' 
acting is as transparent as the prose of a well-seasoned writer.  We 
believe he is principled enough to refuse an offer he shouldn't have 
refused, and the plot hinges on his wrong decision.  In his role as 
"Brill," Byrne acts with smooth efficiency and assurance, completing his 
assignment of throwing off both Robert Dean and the viewer.  What 
casting!
Q:  How do you think the role of Robert Clayton Dean affects the career 
of Will Smith?
A:  A good move.  I heard it said that this is his first starring role, 
but wasn't he at the head of the ensemble casts - if they can be so 
called - of "Independence Day" and "Men In Black"?  (Plus, he's garnered 
the lines of James West, after first being touted as Artie Gordon, in 
"The Wild, Wild West.")  Smith once again proves likable and believable 
in the way he relates to others, and he even manages to pull off two or 
three stints of comic relief in this chase-heavy drama.  A cultural 
aside:  Smith makes a canny self-reference to race when a mobster makes 
a bad choice of words.  Other than this, Smith and his wife and son, 
along with Lisa Bonet as Rachel, are the only blacks in the cast;  not 
much African-American culture is reflected here.  And there are two 
Hispanics, one a nanny, the other a maid.  The last word:  I will pay to 
see Smith again, partly because I like his advocating of discipline and 
responsibility, both in his acting and in his music.
Q:  Critique Gene Hackman's performance as Brill.
A:  Ahead of the ideas and Smith's performance, Hackman is the best 
thing about the movie.  First, his looks are perfect - a sixty-something 
original "techie" who went underground after a debacle in Iran in 1980.  
He is appropriately grizzled and stoic, his hypoglycemia adding to his 
gruffness.  Brill has "disappeared" himself and surfaces only when 
contracted to gather information.  As he demonstrates through his 
expression, his easy way of characterizing complex personalities, and 
his collection of subtle mannerisms, Hackman is one of the very best 
living actors. 
Q:  Explain the main conflict of the film.
A:  After a member of Congress dies mysteriously, a Washington labor 
lawyer, Robert Dean, finds his career ruined and his life in grave 
danger.  Officials in a renegade division of the National Security 
Agency are trying to recover a recording of the Senator's murder, and 
they stop at almost nothing along the way.  (At least they do not kidnap 
the wife or kid:  that would have turned the film into the worst kind of 
"jep" story.)  For quite a while Dean does not know the reason he is 
being hunted;  he thinks a mob boss is after him.  In an ingenious 
conclusion, the main narrative meshes into the subplot involving the 
mobster's videotape the villains on both sides meeting in the kitchen of 
the Italian restaurant.  Another twist is that something happens to the 
tape of the murder, and Dean enlists Brill's help to turn the tables on 
the government thugs.  Yes, this film will inspire paranoia among many 
viewers, but a little thinking about the real speed of most government 
agencies will provide a sense of security!
Q:  Is there too much action in the film?  Are there enough ideas to 
balance with the action?
A:    Having heard from one critic that the film was nothing but a 
collection of slick chase scenes, I went into the theater wary.  I was 
pleasantly taken aback when I was not only entertained by the action, 
but fascinated by the implications.  "Enemy of the State" is layered 
with meanings, ideas that build momentum just as surely as the plot 
builds to a climax.  Because of how subtly these ideas accumulate, the 
film is deceptive in its power.  We witness scene after scene of 
relentless pursuits, deteriorating personal lives, and a host of other 
cliches.  Nevertheless, the material works.  For one, we feel close to 
Dean and Brill;  the number of jams  they fall into and climb out of 
finally pushes the film well past mediocrity.  And the handling of the 
issues of personal privacy, loyalty, and morality provides the viewer 
with plenty outlets for intelligent thought.  I'm reminded of how a 
rather mediocre story like "Mr. Holland's Opus," through its time span 
and patient presentation of themes, became an outstanding film.  "Enemy 
of the State" is from a different genre, but I think some of the same 
patterns apply.
Q:  Would you recommend the film to a friend?  Why or why not?
A:  Yes, and I would urge the friend to feel free to hate it if he or 
she finds reason.  Over the last several months, I have come across many 
negative early reviews, only to hear later that a film is excellent.  
Will I stop reading reviews of films before I see them?  Of course not.  
But I'll remember how crucial it is to think for myself about the 
quality of a film, and I'll remember that part of that quality is highly 
subjective:  Was it pleasing to me, and if it has been judged a poor 
film, were the critics' words valid?  "Enemy of the State" contains some 
objectionable language, but mostly its R rating comes from violent 
scenes, especially one near the end.  I think most viewers will be 
captivated by both its quick wit and action.


Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Tony Scott.
Cast: Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Regina King, Jon Voight, Loren Dean, 
Lisa Bonet, Gabriel Byrne, Seth Green, Jack Black, Jake Busey, Jamie 
Kennedy, Barry Pepper. 
1998 - 128 minutes.
Rated R (for violence and profanity).
Reviewed November 21, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
Well, with "Enemy of the State," the new Jerry Bruckheimer-produced and 
Tony Scott-directed action picture, two things are certain: this film is 
five times better than Bruckheimer's previous embarrassment, 
"Armageddon," and Scott is a much better director than "Armageddon" 
alumni, Michael Bay. Of course, that isn't to say that, "Enemy of the 
State," is actually good. It's just saying that it isn't terrible.
In a refreshing change of pace from usually playing a comedic role, Will 
Smith stars as Robert Dean, a high-pofile lawyer with a loving wife 
(Regina King) and young son (Jascha Washington) living in Georgetown, 
Maryland, who finds his pleasant life quickly start to crumble around 
him. While in a lingerie store buying something for his wife for 
Christmas, a former college friend (Jason Lee) of his bursts in, tries 
to tell him something, and then while Robert isn't looking, drops a 
piece of incriminating evidence into his shopping bag that is proof that 
the National Security Agency murdered a congressman (Jason Robards, who 
appears unbilled) for opposing a Telecommunications Security and Privacy 
Act. Immediately afterwards, the friend is hit by a truck and killed 
while being chased by the NSA. After Robert is linked to the tape that 
shows the murder, his clothes unknowingly are bugged, and he must leave 
his wife and go on the run, even though he does not know what they want, 
at first.
The premise of, "Enemy of the State," is a complex one, to be sure, as 
it also includes a subplot involving Robert and his former girlfriend 
(Lisa Bonet), which I personally found more interesting than the central 
storyline. For the first hour, I was intrigued by, "Enemy of the State," 
and surprised that it wasn't simply a non-stop action movie without any 
character development. The setup for the film was entertaining and 
clever enough, and I liked the relationship set up between Smith and 
Regina King, who is a criminally underrated actress. Meanwhile, Smith 
and Bonet, who I was happy to see again after her absence since the 
cancellation of, "The Cosby Show," had a few nice scenes together. And 
Smith himself, was surprisingly appealing. It is good to see him try a 
more dramatic, challenging role, so he is one step in the right 
direction to being a true breakthrough film star. Gene Hackman has a 
supporting role as Brill, a former agency operative who has been in 
hiding since 1980, who tries to help Robert, but makes very little 
impact.
Unfortunately, the main story, although somewhat thought-provoking when 
dealing with the idea that there is so much high-tech spying equipment 
and cameras nowadays that, for all we know, we might be being watched 
non-stop, the conventional action stuff comes into full-blast in the 
second hour, and to me, it took on a definite "been-there-done-that" 
feeling. This sort of conventional chase picture has been done to death, 
and I think the filmmakers could have thought of something a little more 
original than ending it with a boring shoot-out sequence. It also didn't 
help that the movie could have easily been shortened by at least fifteen 
minutes.
What it all comes down to is that, "Enemy of the State," is a step up 
for Bruckheimer, but is still not very successful, as it still has many 
of his trademarks: a frenetic pace, odd camera angles, and a bunch of 
supporting characters who are only there to sit in chairs and read 
things from monitors. "Enemy of the State," is a sure sign that 
Bruckheimer might one day be able to make a really good film. That is, 
if he learns to focus more on the story, rather than a bunch of 
explosions. 

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Enemy of the State (1998)
Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Jon Voight, Lisa Bonet, Regina King, Stuart 
Wilson, Laura Cayouette, Loren Dean, Barry Pepper, Ian Hart, Jake Busey, 
Scott Caan, Jason Lee, Gabriel Byrne, James L Gros, Dan Butler, Jack 
Black, Jamie Kennedy, Jason Robards (uncredited). Produced by Jerry 
Bruckheimer. Written by David Marconi. Directed by Tony Scott. 127 
minutes.
Rated R, 3 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests to 
pbbp24a@prodigy.com
The tagline for "Enemy of the State" is "It's not paranoia if they're 
really after you." Leaving the theater following the popcorn thriller 
about an innocent man caught in a web of secret agents, surveillance 
equipment and deadly covert activities, I wondered how the movie might 
affect any genuine paranoids in the audience. Just imagine some poor guy, 
feverishly twitching in his seat, thinking "I knew it, they're really out 
there! If fact, they probably create movies just like this to convince us 
that these kind of activities are too fantastic to be true, thereby 
lulling us into a false sense of security." 
For anyone concerned that the elaborate high-level intrigue portrayed in 
"Enemy of the State" reflects reality, let's look at a recent example of 
governmental effectiveness. It took conservatives several years and 
millions of dollars just to prove that President Clinton "got some" on 
the side, and, months after the revelation, he's still in office and the 
Republicans got clobbered in the elections. That, ladies and gentlemen, 
is how our government works.
In "Enemy of the State," Will Smith plays attorney and family man Robert 
Clayton Dean. Life is good for the Washington DC lawyer, until he bumps 
into Zavitz (Jason Lee), an old college buddy. After their brief 
encounter, Zavitz is chased by government operatives, only to be struck 
down and killed on a nearby highway. Dean, shaken by the death of his 
friend, returns home, unaware that Zavitz slipped him a disc documenting 
the assassination of a Congressman by the same group of goons. In short 
order, agents knock on Dean's door and the young professional ends up on 
the run; with his credit and job destroyed, his marriage in a shambles 
and lots of scary guys trying to kill him.
With "Independence Day" and "Men in Black" on his rsum, and "The Wild 
Wild West" due next summer, Will Smith clearly knows how to pick crowd-
pleasing movies and "Enemy of the State" should provide him another hit. 
The film, from "Armageddon" producer Jerry Bruckheimer and "True Romance" 
director Tony Scott, is fast-paced and packed with action and thrills. 
As always, Smith is a likable and convincing all-American hero who 
manages to deliver good one-liners between chases and feats of derring-do.
 Smith works best when paired with older actors, and he has a great one 
here, with Gene Hackman giving a crisp performance as a former operative 
of the National Security Agency. The two actors work very well together.
As a matter of fact, "Enemy of the State" is notable for having a far 
more talented cast than your average action/thriller. Jon Voight gives 
his most focused performance in quite some time as a corrupt State 
Department official. The seasoned veteran is surrounded by a very 
impressive group of bright young actors playing assorted smooth-talking 
snakes, techno-geeks and government thugs. Stand outs include Jack Black 
("Mars Attacks!"), Loren Dean ("Gattica"), Barry Pepper ("Saving Private 
Ryan"), Jamie Kennedy ("Scream 2"), Ian Hart ("The Butcher Boy"), and 
Jake Busey ("Home Fries"). 
As if that wasn't enough, Gabriel Byrne pops up, along with "Chasing 
Amy's" Jason Lee, James Le Gros from "Drugstore Cowboy," "Frasier's" Dan 
Butler and Jason Robards, in an uncredited performance as a Congressman 
with fatal integrity. Add "Angel Heart's" Lisa Bonet and Regina King from 
"How Stella Got Her Groove Back" and you're talking about one hell of a 
powerhouse cast.
Bruckheimer and Scott were wise to load their film with so many talents, 
because it takes actors this good to obscure the many implausibility's of 
the film. Beneath the non-stop barrage of high-tech surveillance and 
action scenes, "Enemy of the State" contains a coincidence-filled 
storyline held together by duct tape. In addition, a couple of the chases 
go on too long and the ending, while satisfying, is way too pat to be 
believed.
But, of course, we're not supposed to believe any of this. After all, 
"Enemy of the State" is just a silly, entertaining, over-the-top paranoid 
thriller and none of it could ever happen in real life. Or maybe that's 
just what they want us to think...

Author
Curtis Edmonds
Stephen Covey is not a moviemaker, and unfortunately, compulsive moviegoing
is not one of The Seven Habits of Highly Effective People.  But the
best-selling author has something to teach us about the moviemaking
process, and Enemy of the State serves as a vehicle for an Important Life
Lesson in spite of itself.
Covey uses the metaphor of the personal savings account to describe
individual integrity.  Your "Personal Integrity Account" increases when you
keep your promises to yourself and build your character.  If you have high
reserves in this account, you're better able to handle personal adversity.
You can also make withdrawals from this account by doing things that
undermine your personal integrity.  (Example:  "Enemy of the State is a
non-stop roller-coaster of a movie!  Be sure to catch this thrill ride!"
Curtis Edmonds, freelance movie reviewer.)
Just as all of us have our own integrity accounts, actors have their own
accounts that they've built up over the years.  When they turn in good
performances, they build up reservoirs of goodwill in the hearts and minds
of the audience.  These reservoirs can be depleted by a bad performance or
filled to overflowing by great work.  And if the actor's balance is very
high, he can cash in some of that balance and turn in a performance where
he doesn't have to do much heavy lifting.  That's exactly what happens in
Enemy of the State.  Producer Jerry Bruckheimer has assembled a team of
good actors -- Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Jon Voight, Barry Pepper -- and
inserted them into a man-on-the-run plotline where everything happens at
high speed and character development is sacrificed for special effects.
The plot appears to be more complicated in the movie than it is on the
trailers, but it really isn't.  Prominent labor lawyer Will Smith has
something that the government wants, and they chase him the whole entire
movie in order to get it.  The "something" in this case is a videotape of
the murder of a Congressman by the National Security Agency.  We know this,
because the opening scene of the movie tells us the who and the why of the
murder, instead of leaving us in the dark and letting us figure out what's
happening at the same time Smith does.  To its credit, Enemy of the State
has a decent subplot involving the Mafia that distracts Smith -- but
instead of letting the audience play along, we're cursed with our superior
knowledge the whole way.
The novelty of the movie is supposed to be the use of satellite
reconnisance to monitor Smith's every move.  The satellite photography is
outstanding, however they got it, but it's edited very jerkily and I think
it's giving me a headache.  The movie ends up being one chase scene after
another, and all the chases seem cribbed from other, better movies.
There's a dash of The Fugitive in a tunnel scene, a shot of John Grisham's
whole lawyer-in-danger thing, a dab of Patriot Games in the satellite
imagery, and generous splashes here and there of Quentin Tarantino, but the
whole concoction never comes together.  (In fact, there's enough Tarantino
influence in Enemy of the State to make one wonder what QT might have done
with the script and these actors -- not to mention that he might have been
a good choice to play one of the geeky high-tech spies.)
To make matters worse, the actors in Enemy of the State aren't playing
actual characters.  Instead, they're playing their on-screen personas.
Smith's character is the Smooth Action Hero, leavened with one-liners.  The
Smooth Action Hero is more mature than in Men In Black or Independence
Day:  the wisecracks are still there, but they're toned down somewhat.
Hackman plays a renegade government agent who is trapped into helping Smith
do the spy stuff, and he plays his part in the same Grumpy Old Commander
persona that he displayed in Crimson Tide, his last effort with Scott.
Voight is coming off evil performances in Mission:  Impossible and The
Rainmaker that mirror his performance as an oily National Security Agency
executive.  And Pepper, fresh from his bravura performance as a Southern
sharpshooter in Saving Private Ryan, plays an NSA assassin who happens to
have a Southern accent.  All the above performances were pretty good --
save maybe for Voight's -- and they're what sustains Enemy of the State and
what allows the actors to make big, huge withdrawals from their integrity
accounts.  Tom Sizemore, almost unrecognizable as a Mafia tough guy, looks
to be the only actor who's not phoning in his performance.
Enemy of the State is not a bad movie, necessarily, it's just formulaic and
derivative and dumb.  It's not filmmaking so much as it's film processing,
just throwing in bits from other movies into the cinematic Cuisinart and
hoping everything comes out OK.  What you get is a moderately entertaining
movie with some good actors turning in average performances.  Instead of
being a win-win movie, (to return to the Covey bit for a second) it's a
win-lose movie -- a win at the box office, a loss for the audience.
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Tabasco sauce is to bachelor cooking what forgiveness is to sin."

Author
Fontaine Lien
Dialogue rehash:
"You're either incredibly smart or incredibly stupid."
        In this latest Jerry Bruckheimer/Touchstone Pictures offering,
Hollywood again repeats itself, but in a kickbutt fashion.  "Enemy of the
State," like any other Jerry Bruckheimer popcorn film, highly entertains. 
This one even more so because it capitalizes on the recent rise of paranoia
as seen on television's "The X-Files," silver screen's "Conspiracy Theory"
(note the plot similarities), "The Net," and "Most Wanted" (starring,
coincidentally, Jon Voight as the baddie).  I loved Gene Hackman as the
gruff, seasoned expert Brill (see Sean Connery in "The Rock") and Will
Smith as the reluctant hero Robert Dean (erm, see Nicholas Cage in "The
Rock").  The characters come to life in emotionally-powered scenes like
Smith's confrontation with Hackman in the elevator, Smith's fight with
Regina King (the wifey).  While the transition of Brill from antagonistic
and unsympathetic to reluctantly friendly paralleled Connery's character a
bit too much for my liking, I ended up rooting for the old man anyways. 
The only character I didn't like was Rachel Banks, partly because of the
way the actress played her.  She seemed too artificial, too forced.  Jon
Voight was convincing, way too convincing as the villain.  I think he should
quit playing these power-hungry high government officials for a while.
        Plotwise, the movie was actually okay.  The action was intense, not
too many plotholes, except having to listen to those two annoying tech
geeks spew off information we already have in a, well, nerdy manner.  For
example, "changing the configuration of Dean's packages" means "a bulge
appeared in Dean's packages."  That seemed dumb, but I assume the extra
dialogue was inserted to give the movie an extra anxiety-factor.  Like
many others I found the ending was the biggest copout, but gee I shouldn't
be surprised given the shootout at the end of "The Rock."  Scott Rosenberg
strikes again.  Despite losing points for lack of originality and "borrowing"
scenes, the tailor-made blockbuster "Enemy of the State" will definitely
satisfy your weekend craving for fast-paced action.  This is what
Bruckheimer does best, ain't it?
"Why are they putting things in my shoe?!"
Rating: B- (First viewing, 11/20/98)
* I'm amused how all the high-tech centers in movies look the same.  For
example, the NSA headquarters here looks a lot like Tommy Lee Jones's
office in "Volcano" and the MIB headquarters in "Men In Black."
* EE fans: didn't the cat and Brill remind you of the cat and Snow?

Author
Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
If you've seen one Tony Scott film you've seen them all, right?  If
you've seen one Jerry Bruckheimer film you've seen them all, right?  If
you like formula concoctions with loud noise, rapid editing and a swift
pace then you'll enjoy 'Enemy of the State', right?  Only once.  This
latest entry into the fast food
market of film is made in the best tradition of Tony Scott's theme of
slick machismo complete with shadows given off by window blinds, the
exploitation of women (where can I find a lingerie store like the one in
this film, darn I'm a hypocrite) and, of course, enough guns,
explosions, chases, and slimy bad guys to fill a dozen movies with only
a couple of good guys to go around.  Although, this time, there is a
nasty looking scene where a boom mic is visible not once but a couple of
times.  It occurs as Will Smith is talking to a mobster about 50 minutes
into the movie.
I don't think I've ever seen a film where the bad guys execute their
evil plans believing all the while that they're doing the right thing
for the good of their country.  Jon Voight portrays a sinister NSA
(National Security Agency) agent who, along with some henchmen, murder a
Congressman who refuses to go along with a telecommunications bill that
will give the government greater power to invade the privacy of its
citizens in the name of national security and their hope is that it will
reduce crime, terrorism, internet mischief and other paranoia they
perceive the be a threat.  Evil for evil is their motto.  It's just too
bad for them that the murder was caught on tape by a hidden camera, used
by a nature photographer and environmentalist whose life is now in
danger.
Will Smith portrays a hot shot Washington D.C. attorney and the man with
the deadly evidence is a friend of his who slips it into Smith's hands
without his knowledge.  Smith now becomes the target of the government's
pursuit of the evidence and there is no shortage of technology with
which to aid them.  Complicating Smith's life is his past as we find out
he had an adulterous affair with a woman from law school and his wife is
suspicious he is fooling around with her again.
There is no surveillance you've ever seen like the type you will see in
this movie.  Cameras that can peek through concrete walls, huge
government database systems that can tap a person's call, bring up their
entire life's history, wiretap them and take pictures of their location
using a satellite 155 miles above the Earth.
Gene Hackman plays a former NSA agent who assists Smith in his evasion
of the government and Hackman has his own agenda for doing so.  Hackman
and Voight are the real actors and characters that make the picture
work.  Smith is a good leading man but there is no substitute for
experience and Voight and Hackman simply upstage him at every turn.
There is also a sub plot involving the mob who make for interesting
allies in the film's climax similar to the guys who helped Arnold
Schwarzenegger in the climax of 'Eraser' but I'm not sure there is a
need to find such witty qualities in organized crime.
Gene Hackman's role is under written as he doesn't appear in the film
until the first 57 minutes and then he is still under used.  A one hit
wonder story can get tiresome after a while and this film is no
exception.
The only redeeming quality the film has is that it points out that even
though citizens of a great country like the United States know that
their country can keep surveillance on them so closely, I don't think
they realize that the technology used in this film is so state of the
art and seeing Gene Hackman in this film brings back memories of his
role as the wire tapper in 1974's 'The Conversation' and one mug shot of
Hackman in the film, used by the government, looks exactly like his
character from that film so I wouldn't be surprised if it was an inside
joke in getting film buffs to find it.
The argument of privacy vs. safety would have been better made in an
academic film rather than a technical one where intelligence is used
this time around as an oxy moron and the audience is so overwhelmed
technically, that they may miss the film's entire point if they don't
focus on the film's message which often gets lifted away with the force
of a tornado like feel and pace.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Michael Redman
Like other popular media, movies often reflect the mood and concerns of the
public. During the fifties, science fiction was a thinly disguised warning of
the communist threat. Recently we've seen numerous films dealing with the
supernatural and the afterlife, mirroring desires for a life more fulfilling.
A theme for years has been the threat of big government and more specifically
lately, the erosion of personal rights. Since Watergate, more and more people
are convinced that every government official is lying. The right points to
Waco and Ruby Ridge as evidence that the Feds are out to get us. The left says
that new powers given to law enforcement continue the slide down the slippery
slope to fascism. The "roving" wiretap law provides for phone taps at any
residence or business that the suspect ever walks into. Drug laws allow
permanent property confiscation without a trial.
Robert Clayton Dean (Will Smith) has always disputed his wife's (Regina King)
belief that our rights are being sold out. He's sure that it's only the
criminals who have anything to fear. Now he's beginning to think that maybe
Carla is right. Someone powerful is out to get the DC labor lawyer. His credit
cards are cancelled. There are eavesdropping bugs planted everywhere he goes.
Tracking devices are all over his clothes. He's wanted for murder. Newspaper
headlines proclaim an affair with an old girlfriend. Something's going on and
he doesn't have a clue.
What Dean doesn't know is that during a chance encounter with an old friend,
he became the unwitting owner of a mini-disk slipped into his shopping bag.
Shortly afterwards he sees his friend lying dead in a city street, his body
being searched by a small army. The disk contains evidence of the murder of a
US congressman by a rogue black ops section of the National Security Agency (a
top secret organization referred to only somewhat inaccurately in the past as
"No Such Agency").
NSA official Thomas Brian Reynolds (Jon Voight) who engineered the
assassination will stop at nothing to retrieve the disk and he has all the
latest electronic spy gizmos at his disposal. Satellites beam high resolution
videos and a truck filled with cool high-tech equipment sees and hears everything.
Dean's wife kicks him out of the house after reading of his supposed sexual
indiscretion. He's fired from his legal firm. With no one else to turn to, he
contacts his college girlfriend, Rachel Banks (Lisa Bonet). She's been the
go-between for him when he needs the services of an underground surveillance
expert known only as "Brill" (Gene Hackman). Brill is his only hope for survival.
The movie is a variation of the wrongly accused man on the run plot, but it's
presented with a high-energy assault on the senses. There's no time to
consider going for popcorn or even to think when the screen attacks your eyes.
The team of producer Jerry Bruckheimer and director Tony Scott (both
responsible for "Top Gun", "Beverly Hills Cop II", "Crimson Tide") doesn't
give us a break in this hyper-active suspense film.
The acting is generally top-notch. Hackman is always a delight and hits his
paranoid character perfectly. It's unfortunate that he doesn't have more
screen time. The subtle references to another film ("The Conversation") where
he played a surveillance expert is intriguing to those that remember the
earlier role. This could almost be the same person 25 years later.
Smith again demonstrates his increasing appeal as a leading man. Here he
convinces us that he's just an ordinary guy caught in circumstances beyond his
control. Some of the comedy bits fall a little flat, but they're soon forgotten.
The rest of the main players do their job admirably but one of the best
aspects of the film is the team of techno-geeks. They're the usual computer
nerds you've seen in other films. Slovenly, looking like they're 14, pushing
lots of buttons and shouting gobbley-gook, this time they're the bad guys.
Especially entertaining is Jack Black.
There are a couple of things that make little sense. The NSA creates a 3-D
image from a surveillance camera in a lingerie shop. It's very doubtful that
the store has enough cameras to furnish the information needed for that. A
scene when Brill and Dean stop to argue in between trains in a coal yard is
questionable. If there were a bunch of bad guys with big guns after me, I
think I'd be running and leave the discussion for later. A few other scenes
would leave the audience wondering about the logic -- if there were an
opportunity to wonder.
The pace is a bit frantic even for an action-adventure film. A little more
time spent on characterization would have been welcome, especially with Brill
and Carla. This isn't exactly a thinking-man's film, then, but they don't all
have to be.
The theater was packed on the day I attended. Of course the new "Star Wars"
trailer shown before the film didn't hurt the turnout. For the first time in
memory, people are paying to see a preview. Luckily the movie that follows is
almost as entertaining. (The preview, by the way, looks dazzling.)
Think you're being overly-suspicious about those odd noises on your phone?
Maybe you are. Or perhaps, as the cut-line for this film says, "It's not
paranoia if they're really after you."
{Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and he's pretty sure
that someone, somewhere is keeping track of everything he says. He's beginning
to suspect that it might be secretly located at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman. Conspiracy theories can go
to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 11/26/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
Fox Davidson
  On the heels of the government conspiracy, Hollywood has been throwing out
thrillers involving one character who knows too much and is one the run left
and right.  In 1995, Sandra Bullock was that character in The Net.  1997, Mel
Gibson was the loon who published conspiracy newsletters in Conspiracy Theory. 
1998, The X-Files hit the big screen with its depiction of alien life being
hidden by evil an government group, The Sydnicate.  Now, Will Smith and madman
producer Jerry Bruckeimer bring their turn of the screw to theaters will Enemy
of the State.  I wish Hollywood would have stopped when the genre was still
good.
  Of course, the only real reason this film was made was because Smith has had
two huge hits in the past two years.  But, oddly, both Independece Day and Men
in Black were huge disappointments, Men in Black being no exception.  Now, in
State, Smith is again cast as the nice guy who saves the world, this time from
a nasty government baddies instead of aliens.
  When a computer hacker discovers a video feed of a high power political
figure assassinated, he is being tracked down by the same assassins.  He flees
his apartment, meets up with good guy lawyer Smith, slips the recorded image (a
disk) into his shopping back, and is killed when mowed down by a truck.  All
that for nothing.  Shame.
  So on, Smith is now on the run, with a former conspiractor (Gene Hackman)
helping him out.  Hackman, looking like a computer geek himself, saves this
film from utter ungliness, which throws in every cliche known to man.  
  And, it doesn't help that State doesn't contain one once of sustained
suspense throughout the film's two hour time length.  Incoherency does not
replace thrills by placing the lead in many situations involving exploding
buildings and roof-top chases.
  Since Enemy of the State is not available on DVD yet, I went and watched
Conspiracy Theory on disc.  I liked the film much better than State.  I also
rewatched The Net on disc.  Yes, I found The Net much more intense than State,
and Theory.  Sandra Bullock's character is so likable, I feared for her life
when in danger.  That never happened in State.

Author
Kleszczewski, Nicholas
_Enemy of the State_ has every reason to be a bad movie.  It was
produced by Jerry Bruckheimer, famous for the fiascos of _Armageddon_
and _Con Air_.  It was directed by Tony Scott, marred by his
stylish-but-hollow career (Beverly Hills Cop 2, Revenge, The Fan).  The
plot--innocent man caught in conspiracy--has been done countless times
before.  Even the dialog in the trailers is bad: "You got something they
want!"/"I don't know what you're talking about!"
EOTS is the techno-geek's dream film - a film that successfully
integrates modern technology into its labyrithrine plot.
This must be hard to do: it takes many years for a film of this caliber
to be conceived, written, then to be pitched, produced, directed, and
edited, all before said technology becomes obsolete.  _The Net_ is a
prime example of how a film rooted in technology would have been much
better had it only been released two years earlier.
I haven't been thrilled by Hollywood's treatment of advancing technology
since _Wargames_ and _Blue Thunder_ hit in '83.  And that may have been
because I was totally unaware of it.  The John Badham one-two punch were
seminal in my love both for modern technology and cinema.
_Enemy of the State_ integrates advanced surveillance techniques into
the standard Hitchcockian formula.  Satellites, normally used for
pointing outward, are pointing _downward_, to the point that chase
scenes are under surveillance, not unlike Christof's in _The Truman
Show_.  Computers are used in conjunction with security systems to
simulate, single out, and magnify the taped events.
Enemy of the State goes one better: it incorporates the talents of the
best "geeks" in Hollywood to sit behind the technology.  They have a
contagious enthusiasm that radiates a
yahoo-we're-gonna-destroy-an-innocent-man's-life mentality. They have
fun, and they've no idea how deadly their participation becomes.  Kudos,
especially, to character nerds Jack Black and Jamie Kennedy.  It's not
that you root for them, but you enjoy their presence.
The final trick up Bruckheimer's sleeve is Gene Hackman.  Not that
Hackman's in it, but that he is playing the same role that he did in
Francis Coppola's _The Conversation_ in 1974.  Brilliant.  In both
films, Hackman plays Harry Caul, a timid but expert surveillance expert.
In the first film he becomes increasingly weary over his profession,
especially as it turns on him.  In this film, he has become a recluse,
working for himself, paranoid and rightly so.
He comes to the aid of Robert Dean (Will Smith), a high-profile attorney
who unknowingly becomes a recipient of a disk containing evidence of a
high-profile murder.  Thomas Reynolds (Jon Voight), not taking any
chances, decides to destroy Smith's credibility, if he were to go public
with the evidence.  The rest of the film Dean is fighting to clean his
record, rid himself of bugs, and stay alive.
The film has several nifty touches, like a detailed (but improbable)
virtual surveillance scene in a lingerie shop.  It has a running gag
with a blender.  It has one of the best used cameos of Gabriel Byrne.
And it marks the return of Lisa Bonet--where has she been?
Alas, the film does fall apart in the end, with a final shootout that is
as cheap as it is predictable.  But for the majority of its playing
time, _State_ gives a good, thrilling ride.  Best to watch this on the
big screen with great sound.
